Ohio, session 136, HB730.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Ohio: Section 200.10. All items in this act are hereby appropriated as designated out of any moneys in the state treasury to the credit of the designated fund. For all operating appropriations made in this act, those in the first column are for fiscal year 2026 and those in the second column are for fiscal year 2027. The operating appropriations made in this act are in addition to any other operating appropriations made for these fiscal years. Section 202.10. 1 2 3 4 5 A ADJ ADJUTANT GENERAL B General Revenue Fund C GRF 745404 Air National Guard $177,548 $100,000 D GRF 745499 Army National Guard $72,452 $0 E General Revenue Fund Total $250,000 $100,000 F TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $250,000 $100,000 Section 204.10. 1 2 3 4 5 A AGE DEPARTMENT OF AGING B General Revenue Fund C GRF 490321 Operating Expenses $19,000 $21,000 D GRF 490411 Senior Community Services $24,000 $95,000 E GRF 656423 Long-Term Care Budget - State $45,000 $90,000 F General Revenue Fund Total $88,000 $206,000 G TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $88,000 $206,000 Section 206.10. 1 2 3 4 5 A AGO ATTORNEY GENERAL B General Revenue Fund C GRF 055321 Operating Expenses $12,000 $400,000 D GRF 055415 County Prosecutors' Pay Supplement $44,000 $66,000 E GRF 055432 Drug Testing Equipment $33,000 $34,000 F General Revenue Fund Total $89,000 $500,000 G TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $89,000 $500,000 Section 208.10. 1 2 3 4 5 A AUD AUDITOR OF STATE B General Revenue Fund C GRF 070401 Audit Management and Services $150,000 $250,000 D GRF 070402 Performance Audits $0 $100,000 E GRF 070404 Fraud/Corruption Audits and Investigations $150,000 $160,000 F GRF 070412 Local Government Audit Support $400,000 $500,000 G General Revenue Fund Total $700,000 $1,010,000 H Dedicated Purpose Fund Group I 5VP0 070611 Local Government Audit Support Fund $400,000 $500,000 J Dedicated Purpose Fund Group Total $400,000 $500,000 K TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $1,100,000 $1,510,000 Section 208.15. LOCAL GOVERNMENT AUDIT SUPPORT FUND Notwithstanding division (A) of section 131.511 of the Revised Code, no adjustment shall be made in fiscal year 2026 to the distribution of tax revenues credited to the Local Government Audit Support Fund (Fund 5VP0) as a result of the fiscal year 2026 appropriation contained in this act for the foregoing appropriation item 070611, Local Government Audit Support Fund. Section 210.10. 1 2 3 4 5 A DDD DEPARTMENT OF DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES B General Revenue Fund C GRF 653321 Medicaid Program Support - State $240,000 $265,000 D General Revenue Fund Total $240,000 $265,000 E TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $240,000 $265,000 Section 212.10. 1 2 3 4 5 A DYS DEPARTMENT OF YOUTH SERVICES B General Revenue Fund C GRF 470401 RECLAIM Ohio $2,200,000 $3,800,000 D GRF 472321 Parole Operations $0 $750,000 E General Revenue Fund Total $2,200,000 $4,550,000 F TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $2,200,000 $4,550,000 Section 214.10. 1 2 3 4 5 A EDU DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION AND WORKFORCE B General Revenue Fund C GRF 200321 Operating Expenses $339,860 $379,087 D General Revenue Fund Total $339,860 $379,087 E TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $339,860 $379,087 Section 216.10. 1 2 3 4 5 A ETC BROADCAST EDUCATIONAL MEDIA COMMISSION B General Revenue Fund C GRF 935430 Broadcast Education Operating $20,000 $100,000 D General Revenue Fund Total $20,000 $100,000 E TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $20,000 $100,000 Section 218.10. 1 2 3 4 5 A DOH DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH B General Revenue Fund C GRF 440451 Public Health Laboratory $47,168 $49,998 D GRF 440453 Health Care Quality Assurance $173,469 $183,877 E GRF 440454 Environmental Health/Radiation Protection $70,179 $74,389 F General Revenue Fund Total $290,816 $308,264 G TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $290,816 $308,264 Section 220.10. 1 2 3 4 5 A OSB DEAF AND BLIND EDUCATION SERVICES B General Revenue Fund C GRF 226321 Operations $0 $569,000 D General Revenue Fund Total $0 $569,000 E TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $0 $569,000 Section 222.10. 1 2 3 4 5 A ETH OHIO ETHICS COMMISSION B General Revenue Fund C GRF 146321 Operating Expenses $70,000 $163,000 D General Revenue Fund Total $70,000 $163,000 E TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $70,000 $163,000 Section 224.10. 1 2 3 4 5 A IGO OFFICE OF THE INSPECTOR GENERAL B General Revenue Fund C GRF 965321 Operating Expenses $15,000 $17,000 D General Revenue Fund Total $15,000 $17,000 E TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $15,000 $17,000 Section 226.10. 1 2 3 4 5 A KID DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN AND YOUTH B General Revenue Fund C GRF 650400 Medicaid Program Support - State $7,947 $8,741 D GRF 830321 Children and Youth Program Management $886,211 $974,833 E General Revenue Fund Total $894,158 $983,574 F TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $894,158 $983,574 Section 228.10. 1 2 3 4 5 A DNR DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES B General Revenue Fund C GRF 727321 Division of Forestry $335,371 $370,371 D GRF 730321 Parks and Recreation $0 $1,600,000 E GRF 741321 Division of Natural Areas and Preserves $125,587 $125,587 F General Revenue Fund Total $460,958 $2,095,958 G TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $460,958 $2,095,958 Section 230.10. 1 2 3 4 5 A DPS DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC SAFETY B General Revenue Fund C GRF 763403 EMA Operating $0 $275,000 D GRF 765401 Emergency Medical Services Operating $110,000 $110,000 E GRF 769406 Homeland Security - Operating $0 $121,000 F General Revenue Fund Total $110,000 $506,000 G TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $110,000 $506,000 Section 232.10. 1 2 3 4 5 A BOR DEPARTMENT OF HIGHER EDUCATION B General Revenue Fund C GRF 235321 Operating Expenses $0 $50,000 D General Revenue Fund Total $0 $50,000 E TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $0 $50,000 Section 234.10. 1 2 3 4 5 A DRC DEPARTMENT OF REHABILITATION AND CORRECTION B General Revenue Fund C GRF 501321 Institutional Operations $3,000,000 $17,500,000 D GRF 505321 Institution Medical Services $3,000,000 $7,500,000 E General Revenue Fund Total $6,000,000 $25,000,000 F TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $6,000,000 $25,000,000 Section 236.10. 1 2 3 4 5 A MIH COMMISSION ON MINORITY HEALTH B General Revenue Fund C GRF 149321 Operating Expenses $0 $11,000 D General Revenue Fund Total $0 $11,000 E TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $0 $11,000 Section 238.10. 1 2 3 4 5 A DVS DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS SERVICES B General Revenue Fund C GRF 900321 Veterans' Homes $500,000 $550,000 D GRF 900408 Department of Veterans Services $0 $46,338 E General Revenue Fund Total $500,000 $596,338 F TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $500,000 $596,338 Section 240.10. 1 2 3 4 5 A JFS DEPARTMENT OF JOB AND FAMILY SERVICES B General Revenue Fund C GRF 600450 Program Operations $1,314,586 $1,893,458 D GRF 600521 Family Assistance - Local $0 $10,000,000 E GRF 655425 Medicaid Program Support $156,982 $0 F General Revenue Fund Total $1,471,568 $11,893,458 G Federal Fund Group H 3840 600610 Food Assistance Programs $0 $2,500,000 I Federal Fund Group Total $0 $2,500,000 J TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $1,471,568 $14,393,458 Section 240.15. PROGRAM OPERATIONS Of the foregoing appropriation item 600450, Program Operations, $500,000 in fiscal year 2027 shall be used by the Department of Job and Family Services, in collaboration with the Department of Medicaid, to contract with a qualified third-party vendor to conduct a comprehensive assessment of the financial network disbursement systems used to make payments for each of the departments' programs. The vendor selected shall have demonstrable experience in recovering public funds, identified as fraudulent payments, from financial institutions. The comprehensive assessment shall do all of the following: (A) Document all payment trails, financial institutions, processors, and financial technology providers in the current ecosystem; (B) Analyze transaction volume, trends, and variances in fund disbursement; (C) Trace the flow of funds from the applicable department through all entities and recipients, with full authorization to partner with financial institutions to identify potential breaking points and weaknesses in the transaction flow; (D) Document the efficacy of current fraud prevention tools, evaluate potential fraud, identify opportunities for recovery, and assess barriers to improving, securing, and recovering funds within the network disbursement system. Section 240.20. FOOD ASSISTANCE ADMINISTRATION The foregoing appropriation items 600521, Family Assistance - Local, and 600610, Food Assistance Programs, shall be allocated to county departments of job and family services to administer the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program. The Director of Job and Family Services shall calculate the amount of federal reimbursement each county department of job and family services or each regional county department of job and family services system is anticipated to lose between October 1, 2026 and June 30, 2027 due to the changes in administrative reimbursement in accordance with 7 U.S.C. 2025(a). The allocations shall be distributed equally to each county, except that no county or regional system shall receive an allocation more than the amount calculated. Section 242.10. 1 2 3 4 5 A SPA COMMISSION ON HISPANIC/LATINO AFFAIRS B General Revenue Fund C GRF 148321 Operating Expenses $30,000 $33,000 D General Revenue Fund Total $30,000 $33,000 E TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $30,000 $33,000 Section 244.10. Within the limits set forth in this act, the Director of Budget and Management shall establish accounts indicating the source and amount of funds for each appropriation made in this act, and shall determine the manner in which appropriation accounts shall be maintained. Expenditures from operating appropriations contained in this act shall be accounted for as though made in, and are subject to all applicable provisions of, H.B. 96 of the 136th General Assembly. Section 301.10. Except as otherwise provided in this act, all capital appropriation items in this act are appropriated out of any moneys in the state treasury to the credit of the designated fund that are not otherwise appropriated for the biennium ending June 30, 2028. Section 353.10. 1 2 3 A ADJ ADJUTANT GENERAL B Reappropriations C Administrative Building Fund (Fund 7026) D C74528 Camp Perry Improvements $750,000 E C74535 Renovations and Improvements $2,000,000 F Administrative Building Fund (Fund 7026) Total $2,750,000 G Army National Guard Service Contract Fund (Fund 3420) H C74537 Renovation Projects - Federal Share $11,000,000 I C74539 Army National Guard Renovations and Improvements - Federal $10,000,000 J Army National Guard Service Contract Fund (Fund 3420) Total $21,000,000 K TOTAL ALL FUNDS $23,750,000 Section 353.15. ARMY NATIONAL GUARD RENOVATIONS AND IMPROVEMENTS - FEDERAL The foregoing appropriation item C74539, Army National Guard Renovations and Improvements – Federal, shall be used to fund capital projects that are coded as receiving one hundred percent federal support. Notwithstanding section 131.35 of the Revised Code, if after the effective date of this section, additional federal funds are made available to the Adjutant General to carry out one hundred percent federally supported projects, the Adjutant General may request that the Director of Budget and Management authorize expenditures in excess of the amounts appropriated to appropriation item C74539, Army National Guard Renovations and Improvements – Federal. Upon approval of the Director of Budget and Management, the additional amounts are hereby appropriated. RENOVATIONS AND IMPROVEMENTS The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C74535, Renovations and Improvements, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C74535, Renovations and Improvements, plus the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C74541, Armory Technology Infrastructure. Section 355.10. 1 2 3 A AGO ATTORNEY GENERAL B Reappropriations C Administrative Building Fund (Fund 7026) D C05517 General Building Renovations $563,578 E C05542 BCI Laboratory Equipment $5,000 F Administrative Building Fund (Fund 7026) Total $568,578 G TOTAL ALL FUNDS $568,578 GENERAL BUILDING RENOVATIONS The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C05517, General Building Renovations, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C05517, General Building Renovations, plus the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C05537, Richfield Facility Renovations. BCI LABORATORY EQUIPMENT The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C05542, BCI Laboratory Equipment, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C05542, BCI Laboratory Equipment, plus up to $134,341. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, the Attorney General shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbered amounts up to $36,213 from appropriation item C05502, Bowling Green Facility, $12,525 from appropriation item C05521, BCI London Renovations, $9,113 from appropriation item C05523, Security Improvements, $39,681 from appropriation item C05525, Richfield HVAC, $13,595 from appropriation item C05529, OPOTA Tactical Training Center Highway Response Course Renovation, and $23,214 from appropriation item C05535, TTC Outdoor Gun Range. Section 357.01. DEPARTMENT OF HIGHER EDUCATION AND STATE INSTITUTIONS OF HIGHER EDUCATION 1 2 3 A BOR DEPARTMENT OF HIGHER EDUCATION B Reappropriations C Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) D C23501 Supercomputer Center Expansion $114,131 E C23530 Technology Initiatives $1,043,620 F C23551 Ohio Innovation Exchange $400,000 G C23560 HEI Critical Maintenance and Upgrades $2,820,723 H C23563 Ohio Cyber Range $227,256 I Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) Total $4,605,730 J Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) K C23568 OARnet - Taxable $9,249,829 L C23569 Research Facility Action and Investment Funds - Taxable $2,355,714 M Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) Total $11,605,543 N TOTAL ALL FUNDS $16,211,273 RESEARCH FACILITY ACTION AND INVESTMENT FUNDS - TAXABLE The foregoing appropriation item C23569, Research Facility Action and Investment Funds - Taxable, shall be used for a grant program to be administered by the Chancellor of Higher Education to provide timely availability of capital facilities for research programs and research-oriented instructional programs at or involving state-supported and state-assisted institutions of higher education. Section 357.02. 1 2 3 A BTC BELMONT TECHNICAL COLLEGE B Reappropriations C Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) D C36800 Basic Renovations $957,768 E C36806 Workforce Based Training and Equipment $5,310 F C36810 Handicap Parking and Parking Improvement for Barr Community Building $125,000 G C36812 Campus Safety Grant Program $29,180 H Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) Total $1,117,258 I Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) J C36807 Workforce Based Training and Equipment - Taxable $166,427 K Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) Total $166,427 L TOTAL ALL FUNDS $1,283,685 BASIC RENOVATIONS The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C36800, Basic Renovations, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C36800, Basic Renovations, plus the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C36809, Industrial Trades Center. Section 357.03. 1 2 3 A BGU BOWLING GREEN STATE UNIVERSITY B Reappropriations C Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) D C24000 Basic Renovations $24,222 E C24035 Library Depository Northwest $294,613 F C24059 Technology Building Renovation $50,038 G C24068 Advanced Manufacturing, Engineering, and Applied Science Corridor $573,966 H C24069 BGSU Water Quality Research and Education Center $8,967 I C24075 Campus Safety Grant Program $66,660 J C24076 Critical Infrastructure Rehabilitation - Mechanical, Electrical, and Plumbing $331,639 K C24078 Academic Building Rehabilitation - Applied Sciences $1,486,336 L C24079 Critical Infrastructure Rehabilitation - Technology - Wired Network $4,000,000 M C24080 Academic Building Infrastructure and Space Rehabilitation - Firelands $697,950 N C24084 Academic Building Rehabilitation $2,839,967 O Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) Total $10,374,358 P TOTAL ALL FUNDS $10,374,358 ACADEMIC BUILDING REHABILITATION - APPLIED SCIENCES The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C24078, Academic Building Rehabilitation - Applied Sciences, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C24078, Academic Building Rehabilitation - Applied Sciences, plus the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C24077, Critical Infrastructure Rehabilitation - Roofing and Building Envelope. Section 357.04. 1 2 3 A COT CENTRAL OHIO TECHNICAL COLLEGE B Reappropriations C Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) D C36928 Campus Safety Grant Program $220,500 E Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) Total $220,500 F TOTAL ALL FUNDS $220,500 Section 357.05. 1 2 3 A CSU CENTRAL STATE UNIVERSITY B Reappropriations C Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) D C25515 Information Technology Network and Infrastructure $800,000 E C25538 Sewer Line and Water Tower Maintenance and Rehabilitation $750,000 F C25541 Dayton Dream Center Transitional Housing $125,000 G C25542 East End Whole Family Services Hub Facility Expansion and Renovation in Dayton $125,000 H C25543 GodRich Food and Farmer's Project $300,000 I Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) Total $2,100,000 J Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) K C25531 Workforce Based Training and Equipment - Taxable $195,000 L Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) Total $195,000 M TOTAL ALL FUNDS $2,295,000 GODRICH FOOD AND FARMER'S PROJECT The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C25543, GodRich Food and Farmer's Project, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C25007, GodRich Food and Farmer's Project. Section 357.06. 1 2 3 A CTC CINCINNATI STATE COMMUNITY COLLEGE B Reappropriations C Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) D C36134 Workforce Based Training and Equipment $9,162 E C36136 Energy Efficiency and Savings Projects $265,995 F C36139 Hamilton County Agricultural Facility Improvements $50,000 G C36140 Main Building Renovations $2,837,489 H C36141 IT System Upgrades $759,971 I C36144 The Building Blocks Of History $25,000 J C36146 Campus Safety Grant Program $226,040 K C36149 La Soupe Basement Expansion $150,000 L Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) Total $4,323,657 M Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) N C36145 Workforce Based Training and Equipment - Taxable $13,520 O C36147 Center for Workforce Innovation - Taxable $372,696 P Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) Total $386,216 Q TOTAL ALL FUNDS $4,709,873 WORKFORCE BASED TRAINING AND EQUIPMENT The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C36134, Workforce Based Training and Equipment, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C36134, Workforce Based Training and Equipment, plus up to $12,702. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, Cincinnati State Community College shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbered amounts up to $12,702 from appropriation item C36137, Greater Cincinnati Manufacturing Careers Accelerator Additive Design and Materials Testing Innovations. MAIN BUILDING RENOVATIONS The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C36140, Main Building Renovations, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C36140, Main Building Renovations, plus the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C36137, Greater Cincinnati Manufacturing Careers Accelerator Additive Design and Materials Testing Innovations, plus the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C36111, Roof Replacement, plus up to $55,271. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, Cincinnati State Community College shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbrances up to $9,257 from appropriation item C36124, STEM Laboratory Renovations, $36,827 from appropriation item C36127, Center for Workforce Innovation and Education, and $9,187 from appropriation item C36135, Student Completion and Career Service One-Stop Center. Section 357.07. 1 2 3 A CLT CLARK STATE COMMUNITY COLLEGE B Reappropriations C Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) D C38526 Safety and Security Upgrades $5,655 E C38527 Rhodes Hall and Applied Science Center Renovation $3,718,031 F C38529 Workforce Based Training and Equipment $8,874 G C38532 Clark State Performing Arts Center $160,525 H C38534 Community Health Partners Musculoskeletal Institute Center of Excellence $125,000 I C38535 Campus Safety Grant Program $112,554 J Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) Total $4,130,639 K Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) L C38533 Workforce Based Training and Equipment - Taxable $17,363 M Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) Total $17,363 N TOTAL ALL FUNDS $4,148,002 Section 357.08. 1 2 3 A CLS CLEVELAND STATE UNIVERSITY B Reappropriations C Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) D C26000 Basic Renovations $300,445 E C26098 MetroHealth Senior Health and Wellness Center $450,000 F C260A1 United Way of Greater Cleveland Building Renovations $150,000 G C260A2 Kenmore Commons Improvements $150,000 H C260A3 Goodwill Industries Training Center $50,000 I C260A5 Campus Safety Grant Program $323,177 J C260A8 Mechanical, Electrical, Plumbing Improvements $3,000,000 K C260B1 Life Safety, IT, and Security Projects $1,169,036 L C260B6 Fenn Hall Façade and Labs $15,000,000 M C260B7 Historic Shaker Square Restoration $100,000 N Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) Total $20,692,658 O TOTAL ALL FUNDS $20,692,658 BASIC RENOVATIONS The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C26000, Basic Renovations, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C26000, Basic Renovations, plus the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C26022, Campus Fire Alarm Upgrade, plus the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C26065, Main Classroom Renovation, plus the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C26079, Rhodes Tower Restroom Renovation, plus the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C26082, Campus-Wide Elevator Modifications, plus the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C26084, IT Security Upgrade and Data Center Restructuring, plus the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C26096, Rhodes Tower Renewal Phase I, plus up to $750,213. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, Cleveland State University shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbered amounts up to $219,111 from appropriation item C26094, Anatomy Laboratory Renovation, $209,571 from appropriation item C26095, Music and Communications Building Roof Replacement, and $321,531 from appropriation item C26096, Rhodes Tower Renewal Phase I. HISTORIC SHAKER SQUARE RESTORATION The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C260B7, Historic Shaker Square Restoration, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C230FM, Cultural and Sports Facilities Projects, earmarked for Levi Scofield Mansion Transformation. Section 357.09. 1 2 3 A CTI COLUMBUS STATE COMMUNITY COLLEGE B Reappropriations C Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) D C38420 Technology Upgrades $48,507 E C38425 Workforce Based Training and Equipment $12,123 F C38428 Business Technologies School $30,008 G C38435 Student Success Renovations $15,000,000 H C38436 Building Repairs $205,850 I C38437 Building Infrastructure Repairs $9,000,000 J C38439 Academic/Student Space Upgrades $119,164 K C38440 Delaware Entrepreneurial Center Ohio Wesleyan $12,182 L C38453 Campus Safety Grant Program $27,835 M C38455 Girl Scouts of Ohio's Heartland STEM and Leadership Immersion Campus $1,500,000 N C38459 Van Buren Center Essential Renovation $500,000 O C38462 CRIS Facilities $40,000 P Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) Total $26,495,669 Q Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) R C38451 Workforce Based Training and Equipment - Taxable $39,203 S C38463 Gravity Project Phase 2 - Taxable $575,000 T C38464 Rickenbacker Area Mobility Center - Taxable $1,000,000 U C38467 Jewish Family Services Technology Hub for Workforce Advancement - Taxable $125,000 V Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) Total $1,739,203 W TOTAL ALL FUNDS $28,234,872 STUDENT SUCCESS RENOVATIONS The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C38435, Student Success Renovations, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C38435, Student Success Renovations, plus up to $5,000. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, Columbus State Community College shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbered amounts up to $5,000 from appropriation item C38435, Student Success Renovations. BUILDING INFRASTRUCTURE REPAIRS The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C38437, Building Infrastructure Repairs, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C38437, Building Infrastructure Repairs, plus up to $266,958. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, Columbus State Community College shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbered amounts up to $266,958 from appropriation item C38437, Building Infrastructure Repairs. Section 357.10. 1 2 3 A CCC CUYAHOGA COMMUNITY COLLEGE B Reappropriations C Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) D C37800 Basic Renovations $4,500,000 E C37853 CWRU Dental Clinic Relocation $200,000 F C37862 Cleveland Institute of Art Interactive Media Lab $150,000 G C37867 The Lyric Center $75,000 H C37869 Shoes and Clothes for Kids $175,000 I C37871 The Cleveland Institute of Art $550,000 J C37876 Wayfinding Signage Upgrades $1,500,000 K C37877 Replace Campus Security Servers $202,592 L C37879 Corporate College Renovations $336,452 M C37880 American Cancer Society's Cleveland Hope Lodge Renovation $50,000 N Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) Total $7,739,044 O Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) P C37865 Workforce Based Training and Equipment - Taxable $71,713 Q C37881 Construction Based Trades Academy - Taxable $200,000 R C37882 Medina Christian Academy Capital Expansion - Taxable $300,000 S Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) Total $571,713 T TOTAL ALL FUNDS $8,310,757 BASIC RENOVATIONS The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C37800, Basic Renovations, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C37800, Basic Renovations, plus up to $402,953. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, Cuyahoga Community College shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbrances up to $402,953 from appropriation item C37800, Basic Renovations. Section 357.12. 1 2 3 A ESC EDISON STATE COMMUNITY COLLEGE B Reappropriations C Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) D C39000 Basic Renovations $104,900 E C39018 HVAC Repair and Replacements $58,040 F C39029 Campus Safety Grant Program $27,348 G C39032 Classroom and Lab Renovations $52,292 H C39033 Edison State Engineering Lab and Classroom Renovation $500,000 I C39034 Edison State Nursing Wing Renovation $500,000 J Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) Total $1,242,580 K Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) L C39025 Workforce Based Training and Equipment - Taxable $46,476 M C39030 Basic Renovations - Taxable $7,615 N Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) Total $54,091 O TOTAL ALL FUNDS $1,296,671 BASIC RENOVATIONS The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C39000, Basic Renovations, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C39000, Basic Renovations, plus the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C39019, Parking Lot Resurfacing, plus up to $6,900. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, the Edison State Community College shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbered amounts up to $6,900 from appropriation item C39000, Basic Renovations. Section 357.13. 1 2 3 A HTC HOCKING TECHNICAL COLLEGE B Reappropriations C Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) D C36300 Basic Renovations $927,574 E C36328 McClenaghan Center for Culinary Hospitality - Renovation $767,086 F C36334 Hocking Aquaculture Project $117,945 G C36336 Campus Safety Grant Program $125,858 H C36337 Firing Range and Classroom Renovations $150,000 I C36347 Hocking College Advanced Manufacturing Lab $200,000 J Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) Total $2,288,463 K Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) L C36335 Workforce Based Training and Equipment - Taxable $182,764 M Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) Total $182,764 N TOTAL ALL FUNDS $2,471,227 BASIC RENOVATIONS The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C36300, Basic Renovations, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C36300, Basic Renovations, plus the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C36323, Equestrian and Veterinary Workforce Facilities Renovation, plus up to $39,398. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, Hocking Technical College shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbered amounts up to $39,398 from appropriation item C36334, Hocking Aquaculture Project. MCCLENAGHAN CENTER FOR CULINARY HOSPITALITY - RENOVATION The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C36328, McClenaghan Center for Culinary Hospitality - Renovation, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C36328, McClenaghan Center for Culinary Hospitality - Renovation, plus the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C36327, Public Safety and Natural Resources Program Laboratory Renovation and Expansion. Section 357.14. 1 2 3 A LTC JAMES RHODES STATE COLLEGE B Reappropriations C Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) D C38100 Basic Renovations $1,746,485 E C38116 Center for Health Science Education and Innovation $128,978 F C38122 Campus Safety Upgrades $103,239 G C38126 Campus Safety Grant Program $199,365 H C38128 Parking Lot Improvements $53,074 I C38129 Technology Infrastructure Upgrades $958,142 J C38130 Classroom and Lab Space Renovations $28,449 K Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) Total $3,217,732 L Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) M C38125 Workforce Based Training and Equipment - Taxable $239,798 N Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) Total $239,798 O TOTAL ALL FUNDS $3,457,530 Section 357.15. 1 2 3 A KSU KENT STATE UNIVERSITY B Reappropriations C Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) D C27079 Blossom Music Center $3,800,000 E C270F3 Severance Hall $3,850,000 F C270H2 Founders Hall HVAC Upgrades - Tuscarawas $163,098 G C270I5 White Hall Rehabilitation - Kent $561,261 H C270K3 Critical Deferred Maintenance - Kent $1,604,183 I C270K4 Campus ADA Improvements - Kent $272,993 J C270K7 Nursing Skills Lab Renovation - Geauga $83,672 K C270K9 Rockwell Hall Renovation and Expansion - Kent $45,000 L C270L5 Garfield Zimmerman Home $250,000 M C270L8 Blossom Music Center Improvements $2,400,000 N C270M1 Severance Hall $800,000 O C270M4 Campus Safety Grant Program $500,000 P C270M9 Library - Theater Building Roof Replacement - Trumbull $90,259 Q C270N1 Main Classroom Rooftop Unit Replacement Phase I - Salem $196,098 R C270N2 IT Network Access Enhancement in Academic Buildings - Kent $1,260,506 S C270N5 Severance Music Center $500,000 T C270O3 Purinton Hall Renovations - East Liverpool $300,000 U C270O5 University Library Tower Renovations and Elevator Modernization - Kent $4,500,000 V C270O6 Elevator Modernizations for Accessibility - Kent $3,000,000 W C270O7 Central Chiller Plant Replacement - Stark $652,392 X C270O9 Main Hall Entrance Renovation - Ashtabula $163,098 Y C270P5 Blossom Music Center $1,050,000 Z C270P6 Porthouse Theater Improvements $147,300 AA Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) Total $26,189,860 AB Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) AC C270H6 Workforce Based Training and Equipment - Taxable $277,147 AD C270O4 Classroom Building Renovations - East Liverpool - Taxable $8,664 AE C270P3 Cunningham Hall Deferred Maintenance Phase II - Kent - Taxable $80,712 AF C270P7 Ashland County Airport Authority Terminal and Flight School Project - Taxable $150,000 AG C270P8 TRAM Innovation Center - Taxable $800,000 AH Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) Total $1,316,523 AI TOTAL ALL FUNDS $27,506,383 CRITICAL DEFERRED MAINTENANCE - KENT The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C270K3, Critical Deferred Maintenance - Kent, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C270K3, Critical Deferred Maintenance - Kent, plus the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C270G3, Fire Alarm System Replacements, plus up to $5,106. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, Kent State University shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbered amounts up to $5,106 from appropriation item C270I4, Henderson Hall HVAC and ADA Improvements. MAIN CLASSROOM ROOFTOP UNIT REPLACEMENT PHASE I - SALEM The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C270N1, Main Classroom Rooftop Unit Replacement Phase I - Salem, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C270N1, Main Classroom Rooftop Unit Replacement Phase I - Salem, plus the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C270K6, Classroom 127 Renovation/Electrical System Upgrades - Salem. PURINTON HALL RENOVATIONS - EAST LIVERPOOL The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C270O3, Purinton Hall Renovations - East Liverpool, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C270O3, Purinton Hall Renovations - East Liverpool, plus the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C27003, Classroom Building Renovations - East Liverpool. MAIN HALL ENTRANCE RENOVATION - ASHTABULA The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C270O9, Main Hall Entrance Renovation - Ashtabula, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C270O9, Main Hall Entrance Renovation - Ashtabula, plus the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C270I7, Library Asbestos Abatement and Restroom Installation - Ashtabula. Section 357.16. 1 2 3 A LCC LAKELAND COMMUNITY COLLEGE B Reappropriations C Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) D C37900 Basic Renovations $447,217 E C37928 Campus Safety Grant Program $197,741 F C37935 Mechanic Infrastructure Replacement $693,537 G C37936 Electric Infrastructure Replacement $88,925 H Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) Total $1,427,420 I Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) J C37927 Workforce Based Training and Equipment - Taxable $164,157 K Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) Total $164,157 L TOTAL ALL FUNDS $1,591,577 BASIC RENOVATIONS The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C37900, Basic Renovations, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C37900, Basic Renovations, plus the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C37919, Engineering Building Renovations. Section 357.17. 1 2 3 A LOR LORAIN COMMUNITY COLLEGE B Reappropriations C Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) D C38333 Campus Safety Grant Program $6,482 E Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) Total $6,482 F TOTAL ALL FUNDS $6,482 Section 357.18. 1 2 3 A MTC MARION TECHNICAL COLLEGE B Reappropriations C Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) D C35916 Bryson Hall Renovations $852,456 E C35921 Campus Safety Grant Program $118,000 F C35922 Library Classroom Building Renovations $511,455 G C35923 Bryson Hall Renovations $1,150,000 H C35924 Engineering Classroom and Lab Renovations at Marion Technical College $100,000 I Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) Total $2,731,911 J TOTAL ALL FUNDS $2,731,911 BRYSON HALL RENOVATIONS The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C35923, Bryson Hall Renovations, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C35923, Bryson Hall Renovations, plus up to $30,739. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, Marion Technical College shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbered amounts up to $5,781 from appropriation item C35912, Bryson Hall Renovations, and $24,958 from appropriation item C35916, Bryson Hall Renovations. Section 357.19. 1 2 3 A MUN MIAMI UNIVERSITY B Reappropriations C Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) D C28502 Basic Renovations - Hamilton $42,088 E C28503 Basic Renovations - Middletown $24,871 F C28505 Cooperative Regional Library Depository Southwest $261,822 G C28527 Campus Safety Grant Program $108,260 H C28528 Bachelor Hall Renovation $223,119 I C28591 Butler Tech Manufacturing Center $200,000 J C28592 Middletown Regional Airport Aviation Workforce Training Center $750,000 K Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) Total $1,610,160 L Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) M C28599 Workforce Based Training and Equipment - Taxable $481,043 N Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) Total $481,043 O TOTAL ALL FUNDS $2,091,203 Section 357.20. 1 2 3 A NCC NORTH CENTRAL TECHNICAL COLLEGE B Reappropriations C Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) D C38000 Basic Renovations $132,356 E C38010 Kehoe Center Infrastructure Renovation $122,389 F C38014 IT Data Infrastructure Upgrade Project $32,930 G C38031 IT Infrastructure Upgrades $183,000 H C38032 Campus Safety Grant Program $79,806 I C38034 Security Card Access System $325,000 J C38035 Parking Lot Renovations $345,500 K C38036 Fallerius Center Chiller and Switchgear Renovations $750,000 L C38037 Child Development Center Renovations $589,187 M Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) Total $2,560,168 N Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) O C38028 Workforce Based Training and Equipment - Taxable $269,863 P Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) Total $269,863 Q TOTAL ALL FUNDS $2,830,031 Section 357.21. 1 2 3 A NEM NORTHEAST OHIO MEDICAL UNIVERSITY B Reappropriations C Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) D C30500 Basic Renovations $104,257 E C30501 Cooperative Regional Library Depository Northeast $77,597 F C30547 Mercy Medical OBGYN Emergency Department $90,000 G C30553 Mansfield Regional Behavioral Center $400,000 H C30554 Cleveland Clinic Mercy Hospital Cancer Center $500,000 I C30555 Akron Children's Rehabilitation Services $150,000 J C30562 NEOMED Chiller Plant Upgrades $1,000,000 K Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) Total $2,321,854 L Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) M C30563 Hall of Fame Village Center for Excellence - Taxable $1,000,000 N Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) Total $1,000,000 O TOTAL ALL FUNDS $3,321,854 BASIC RENOVATIONS The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C30500, Basic Renovations, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C30500, Basic Renovations, plus the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C30542, Distributed Antenna System and Enhanced Video Security Surveillance System, plus the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C30551, Building D Roof Replacement. Section 357.22. 1 2 3 A NTC NORTHWEST STATE COMMUNITY COLLEGE B Reappropriations C Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) D C38200 Basic Renovations $75,929 E C38219 Building B Renovations $32,000 F C38222 Northwest State Community College Cyber Disaster Recovery Site $7,839 G C38223 Campus Safety Grant Program $268,398 H Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) Total $384,166 I Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) J C38211 Workforce Based Training and Equipment - Taxable $161,671 K Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) Total $161,671 L TOTAL ALL FUNDS $545,837 WORKFORCE BASED TRAINING AND EQUIPMENT - TAXABLE The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C38211, Workforce Based Training and Equipment - Taxable, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C38211, Workforce Based Training and Equipment - Taxable, plus up to $47,963. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, Northwest State Community College shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbered amounts up to $47,963 from appropriation item C38211, Workforce Based Training and Equipment – Taxable. Section 357.23. 1 2 3 A OSU OHIO STATE UNIVERSITY B Reappropriations C Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) D C315AZ Neuromodulation Clinical Expansion $395,266 E C315BR Replacement Emergency Generators $3,000,000 F C315D2 Supercomputer Center Expansion $5,000 G C315DE Ohio Library and Information Network $5,000 H C315DM Roof Repair and Replacements $10,000,000 I C315DN Fire System Replacements $5,000,000 J C315DP HVAC Repair and Replacements $6,500,000 K C315DQ Elevator Safety Repairs and Replacements $8,000,000 L C315DR Infrastructure Improvements $1,970,046 M C315DS Building Envelope Repair $6,000,000 N C315DT Plumbing Repair $3,615,815 O C315DU Road and Bridge Improvements $162,737 P C315ET Research Portal - Taxable $8,035 Q C315FA Higher Education Information System Maintenance/Upgrades $48,065 R C315FC Postle Partial Replacement $204,726 S C315FD Electrical Repairs $5,000,000 T C315FV Mathematical Biosciences Buildings Renovations $12,567 U C315GC Newton Hall Renovation/Addition $62,521 V C315GZ Biomedical and Materials Engineering Complex $626,728 W C315HM Fisher Hall Renovation - Wooster $6,000,000 X C315HW Columbus Speech and Hearing Care Facility $300,000 Y C315HZ Campus Safety Grant Program $215,976 Z C315IF Reed Hall Theatre Renovation - Lima $32,194 AA C315IP Boiler Replacement - Marion $7,508 AB C315IQ Reese Center Boiler/Chiller Replacement - Newark $98,578 AC C315JK Mansfield Campus-Wide Upgrades $445,848 AD C315JO Evans Lab Partial Demolition (1969 Addition) $2,137,767 AE C315JP Chiller/Tower Renewal $1,407,907 AF C315JQ Science Building Safety and Renovations - Lima $350,300 AG C315JR Cook Hall Restrooms - Lima $98,793 AH C315JS Galvin Hall Phase II - Lima $900,000 AI C315JU Campus Concrete Work - Lima $8,311 AJ C315JV Ovalwood Hall Chillers and Cooling Tower - Mansfield $1,700,000 AK C315JX Maynard Hall Renovations - Marion $162,491 AL C315JY Library Classroom Building Renovations - Marion $550,000 AM C315JZ Morrill Hall Fire Panel/Elevator Update - Marion $805,361 AN C315KA LeFevre Hall Chiller and Cooling Tower Replacement - Newark $14,777 AO C315KB Pavement Improvements - Newark $41,288 AP C315KC Hopewell/Adena Faculty Office Renovations - Newark $11,228 AQ C315KD New Campus Entrance - Newark $1,300,200 AR C315KE Marion Campus-Wide Upgrades $1,794,145 AS C315KK PrimaryOne Health Specialty Access Project $250,000 AT C315KL Advanced Radiation Therapy in Clark County, Ohio $750,000 AU C315X2 Integrated Technical Infrastructure $230,199 AV Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) Total $70,229,377 AW Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) AX C315DF Workforce Based Training and Equipment - Taxable $200,307 AY C315HY OARnet - Taxable $81,285 AZ C315KX Research Portal Project - Taxable $26,588 BA C315KY REV1 Ventures Modern Innovation Center and Incubator - Taxable $500,000 BB C315KZ Heath Port Authority Air Force Lab - Taxable $41,000 BC Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) Total $849,180 BD TOTAL ALL FUNDS $71,078,557 SUPERCOMPUTER CENTER EXPANSION The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C315D2, Supercomputer Center Expansion, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C315D2, Supercomputer Center Expansion, plus up to $70,289. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, Ohio State University shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbered amounts up to $70,289 from appropriation item C315D2, Supercomputer Center Expansion. OHIO LIBRARY AND INFORMATION NETWORK The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C315DE, Ohio Library and Information Network, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C315DE, Ohio Library and Information Network, plus up to $8,803. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, Ohio State University shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbered amounts up to $8,803 from appropriation item C315DE, Ohio Library and Information Network. ROOF REPAIR AND REPLACEMENTS The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C315DM, Roof Repair and Replacements, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C315DM, Roof Repair and Replacements, plus up to $38,770. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, Ohio State University shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbered amounts up to $38,770 from appropriation item C315DM, Roof Repair and Replacements. FIRE SYSTEM REPLACEMENTS The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C315DN, Fire System Replacements, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C315DN, Fire System Replacements, plus up to $50,914. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, Ohio State University shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbered amounts up to $50,914 from appropriation item C315DN, Fire System Replacements. HVAC REPAIR AND REPLACEMENTS The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C315DP, HVAC Repair and Replacements, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C315DP, HVAC Repair and Replacements, plus up to $432,724. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, Ohio State University shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbered amounts up to $432,724 from appropriation item C315DP, HVAC Repair and Replacements. BUILDING ENVELOPE REPAIR The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C315DS, Building Envelope Repair, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C315DS, Building Envelope Repair, plus up to $5,136. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, Ohio State University shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbered amounts up to $5,136 from appropriation item C315DS, Building Envelope Repair. PLUMBING REPAIR The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C315DT, Plumbing Repair, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C315DT, Plumbing Repair, plus up to $83,743. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, Ohio State University shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbered amounts up to $83,743 from appropriation item C315DT, Plumbing Repair. ROAD/BRIDGE IMPROVEMENTS The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C315DU, Road/Bridge Improvements, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C315DU, Road/Bridge Improvements, plus up to $32,178. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, Ohio State University shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbered amounts up to $32,178 from appropriation item C315DU, Road/Bridge Improvements. ELECTRICAL REPAIRS The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C315FD, Electrical Repairs, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C315FD, Electrical Repairs, plus up to $71,467. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, Ohio State University shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbered amounts up to $71,467 from appropriation item C315FD, Electrical Repairs. FISHER HALL RENOVATION - WOOSTER The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C315HM, Fisher Hall Renovation - Wooster, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C315HM, Fisher Hall Renovation - Wooster, plus the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C315DZ, HVAC Repair and Replacements - Wooster. GALVIN HALL PHASE 2 - LIMA The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C315JS, Galvin Hall Phase 2 - Lima, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C315JS, Galvin Hall Phase 2 - Lima, plus up to $14,692. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, Ohio State University shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbered amounts up to $14,692 from appropriation item C315HB, Galvin Hall Basement Renovations - Lima. OVALWOOD HALL CHILLERS AND COOLING TOWER - MANSFIELD The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C315JV, Ovalwood Hall Chillers and Cooling Tower - Mansfield, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C315JV, Ovalwood Hall Chillers and Cooling Tower - Mansfield, plus the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C315HC, Boiler Replacement - Mansfield, plus the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C315HE, HVAC and Emergency Generators - Mansfield, plus the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C315HG, Exterior Signs and Walk Renovation – Mansfield. NEW CAMPUS ENTRANCE - NEWARK The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C315KD, New Campus Entrance - Newark, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C315KD, New Campus Entrance - Newark, plus up to $20,883. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, Ohio State University shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbered amounts up to $6,259 from appropriation item C315HK, Reese Center HVAC Renovations - Newark, and $14,624 from appropriation item C315GL, Founders Hall Renovations – Newark. MARION CAMPUS-WIDE UPGRADES The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C315KE, Marion Campus-Wide Upgrades, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C315KE, Marion Campus-Wide Upgrades, plus the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C315IL, LED Light Conversions – Marion, plus up to $6,908. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, Ohio State University shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbered amounts up to $6,908 from appropriation item C315HH, Alber Student Center Renovation - Marion. INTEGRATED TECHNICAL INFRASTRUCTURE The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C315X2, Integrated Technical Infrastructure, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C315X2, Integrated Technical Infrastructure, plus up to $15,713. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, Ohio State University shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbered amounts up to $15,713 from appropriation item C315X2, Integrated Technical Infrastructure. Section 357.24. 1 2 3 A OHU OHIO UNIVERSITY B Reappropriations C Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) D C30025 Southeast Library Warehouse $171,298 E C30075 Infrastructure Improvements $69,559 F C30136 Building Envelope Restorations $224,061 G C30157 Building and Safety System Improvements $148,471 H C30158 Academic Space Renewal $1,095,510 I C30162 Lancaster Building/Infrastructure Renewal $25,075 J C30163 Southern Building/Infrastructure Renewal $15,300 K C30164 Building Interior Improvements - Regional Campuses $5,000 L C30169 CWRU Health Education Campus $1,000,000 M C30171 Campus Infrastructure Improvements - Regional Campuses $601,670 N C30179 Building Exterior Improvements - Regional Campuses $40,700 O C30181 Lancaster Festival Upgrades $100,000 P C30183 MOV2GO Foundation Facility Expansion $50,000 Q C30185 Lancaster Festival Security Enhancements $100,000 R C30186 Chesterhill Lions Club $50,000 S C30188 Fairfield County CDL Training and Testing Lot $300,000 T Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) Total $3,996,644 U TOTAL ALL FUNDS $3,996,644 SOUTHEAST LIBRARY WAREHOUSE The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C30025, Southeast Library Warehouse, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C30025, Southeast Library Warehouse, plus up to $20,400. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, Ohio University shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbered amounts up to $20,400 from appropriation item C30025, Southeast Library Warehouse. INFRASTRUCTURE IMPROVEMENTS The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C30075, Infrastructure Improvements, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C30075, Infrastructure Improvements, plus up to $27,462. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, Ohio University shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbered amounts up to $27,462 from appropriation item C30075, Infrastructure Improvements. BUILDING ENVELOPE RESTORATIONS The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C30136, Building Envelope Restorations, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C30136, Building Envelope Restorations, plus up to $13,400. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, Ohio University shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbered amounts up to $13,400 from appropriation item C30136, Building Envelope Restorations. ACADEMIC SPACE RENEWAL The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C30158, Academic Space Renewal, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C30158, Academic Space Renewal, plus up to $202,858. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, Ohio University shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbered amounts up to $202,858 from appropriation item C30158, Academic Space Renewal. BUILDING INTERIOR IMPROVEMENTS - REGIONAL CAMPUSES The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C30164, Building Interior Improvements - Regional Campuses, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C30164, Building Interior Improvements - Regional Campuses, plus up to $15,105. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, Ohio University shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbered amounts up to $15,105 from appropriation item C30164, Building Interior Improvements - Regional Campuses. CAMPUS INFRASTRUCTURE IMPROVEMENTS - REGIONAL CAMPUSES The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C30171, Campus Infrastructure Improvements - Regional Campuses, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C30171, Campus Infrastructure Improvements - Regional Campuses, plus up to $570,856. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, Ohio University shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbered amounts up to $570,856 from appropriation item C30171, Campus Infrastructure Improvements - Regional Campuses. FAIRFIELD COUNTY CDL TRAINING AND TESTING LOT The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C30188, Fairfield County CDL Training and Testing Lot, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C36346, Fairfield County CDL Training and Testing Lot. Section 357.25. 1 2 3 A OTC OWENS COMMUNITY COLLEGE B Reappropriations C Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) D C38824 Access Improvement Projects $181,315 E C38834 HVAC Renovation and Replacement $1,106,810 F C38840 Findlay Family YMCA $400,000 G C38853 Owens Community College Robotics and PLC Lab Expansion (Perrysburg) $450,200 H Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) Total $2,138,325 I TOTAL ALL FUNDS $2,138,325 Section 357.26. 1 2 3 A RGC RIO GRANDE COMMUNITY COLLEGE B Reappropriations C Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) D C35608 College Completion to Career Center $8,290 E Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) Total $8,290 F Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) G C35620 Technology Infrastructure Information System - Taxable $326,754 H C35624 Jackson Center Acquisition and Renovation - Taxable $177,877 I C35630 Basic Renovations - Taxable $987,087 J C35631 Rio Grande Community College Expansion - Taxable $171,900 K Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) Total $1,663,618 L TOTAL ALL FUNDS $1,671,908 Section 357.27. 1 2 3 A SSC SHAWNEE STATE UNIVERSITY B Reappropriations C Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) D C32400 Basic Renovations $2,694,121 E C32431 Clark Memorial Library - Rehabilitation and Repurposing $489,500 F C32438 Campus Safety Grant Program $55,936 G C32439 Shawnee State University Campus Gateway and Innovation District $160,100 H Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) Total $3,399,657 I Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) J C32437 Workforce Based Training and Equipment - Taxable $299,942 K Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) Total $299,942 L TOTAL ALL FUNDS $3,699,599 BASIC RENOVATIONS The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C32400, Basic Renovations, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C32400, Basic Renovations, plus up to $36,912. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, Shawnee State University shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbered amounts up to $36,912 from appropriation item C32400, Basic Renovations. Section 357.28. 1 2 3 A SCC SINCLAIR COMMUNITY COLLEGE B Reappropriations C Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) D C37745 Advanced Manufacturing and Skilled Trades Training Hub $3,500,000 E C37764 Greater West Dayton Incubator $300,000 F C37768 Campus-Wide General Plumbing Replacement $2,967,992 G C37769 Campus-Wide Chiller Replacement $374,250 H C37770 Energy Conservation/Basic Renovations $3,000,000 I C37773 Learning Environment Renovations $2,037,997 J C37776 Air Handler Replacements $2,623,000 K Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) Total $14,803,239 L Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) M C37756 Workforce Based Training and Equipment - Taxable $11,679 N C37780 Food Service Renovations Centerville - Taxable $122,805 O Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) Total $134,484 P TOTAL ALL FUNDS $14,937,723 Section 357.29. 1 2 3 A SOC SOUTHERN STATE COMMUNITY COLLEGE B Reappropriations C Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) D C32200 Basic Renovations $2,538,816 E C32225 Campus Security Systems Project $187,924 F C32229 Campus Safety Grant Program $256,448 G C32232 Ohio Christian University Organic Chemistry Laboratories $150,000 H C32233 Southern State Community College Technology Center of Excellence $1,385,930 I C32234 Information Technology Center of Excellence $1,000,000 J Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) Total $5,519,118 K Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) L C32228 Workforce Based Training and Equipment - Taxable $38,281 M Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) Total $38,281 N TOTAL ALL FUNDS $5,557,399 Section 357.30. 1 2 3 A STC STARK TECHNICAL COLLEGE B Reappropriations C Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) D C38921 HVAC Repair and Replacements $248,489 E C38924 Parking Lot Resurfacing $5,000 F C38934 Barberton Headstart Expansion $200,000 G C38942 Campus Safety Grant Program $5,746 H C38944 Campus Security Upgrades $60,242 I Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) Total $519,477 J Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) K C38941 Workforce Based Training and Equipment - Taxable $23,395 L Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) Total $23,395 M TOTAL ALL FUNDS $542,872 PARKING LOT RESURFACING The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C38924, Parking Lot Resurfacing, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C38924, Parking Lot Resurfacing, plus the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C38900, Basic Renovations, plus the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C38935, Roof Replacements, plus up to $481,465. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, Stark Technical College shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbered amounts up to $6,901 from appropriation item C38924, Parking Lot Resurfacing, $58,571 from appropriation item C38929, Akron Education Workforce Ctr, and $415,993 from appropriation item C38937, 21st Century Campus Digital Transformation Project. Section 357.31. 1 2 3 A TTC TERRA STATE COMMUNITY COLLEGE B Reappropriations C Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) D C36427 Campus Safety Grant Program $5,650 E C36432 Elevator Upgrades $5,000 F C36434 Academic Learning Lab Renovations $180,000 G C36435 Roof Replacements $220,177 H Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) Total $410,827 I Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) J C36426 Workforce Based Training and Equipment - Taxable $177,082 K Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) Total $177,082 L TOTAL ALL FUNDS $587,909 CAMPUS SAFETY GRANT PROGRAM The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C36427, Campus Safety Grant Program, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C36427, Campus Safety Grant Program, plus up to $17,030. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, the Terra State Community College shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbered amounts up to $17,030 from appropriation item C36419, Repaving Parking Lots. ELEVATOR UPGRADES The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C36432, Elevator Upgrades, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C36432, Elevator Upgrades, plus up to $11,071. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, the Terra State Community College shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbered amounts up to $11,071 from appropriation item C36422, Building B Server Room Duct Work. ACADEMIC LEARNING LAB RENOVATIONS The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C36434, Academic Learning Lab Renovations, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C36434, Academic Learning Lab Renovations, plus up to $24,907. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, the Terra State Community College shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbered amounts up to $6,792 from appropriation item C36417, Ohio Partnership for Water, Industrial, and Cyber Security, and $18,115 from appropriation item C36424, Math Laboratory Renovation. ROOF REPLACEMENTS The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C36435, Roof Replacements, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C36435, Roof Replacements, plus up to $52,023. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, the Terra State Community College shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbered amounts up to $15,016 from appropriation item C36412, Water and Sewage Renovation, and $37,007 from appropriation item C36420, Building E Renovations. Section 357.32. 1 2 3 A UAK UNIVERSITY OF AKRON B Reappropriations C Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) D C25086 Ashland County - West Holmes Career Center Workforce Development Center $300,000 E C25091 Canton Jewish Community Project $50,000 F C25097 Polsky Arts Center $5,000,000 G Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) Total $5,350,000 H TOTAL ALL FUNDS $5,350,000 Section 357.33. 1 2 3 A UCN UNIVERSITY OF CINCINNATI B Reappropriations C Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) D C26697 Vontz Center Roof, Panel, and Window Replacements $277,114 E C266B2 Ohio Cyber Range $662,662 F C266D2 One Building, Thriving Families $650,000 G C266D6 The Dragonfly Foundation Landing Renovations $320,000 H C266D7 Mercantile Library Improvements $125,000 I C266D8 Urban League Renovation & Addition $145,000 J C266D9 Meals on Wheels Facility Improvement $750,000 K C266E1 Santa Maria Community Facility $450,000 L Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) Total $3,379,776 M Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) N C266A9 Workforce Based Training and Equipment - Taxable $15,167 O Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) Total $15,167 P TOTAL ALL FUNDS $3,394,943 Section 357.34. 1 2 3 A UTO UNIVERSITY OF TOLEDO B Reappropriations C Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) D C34080 Building Envelope/Weatherproofing $5,000 E C34095 Underground Steam/Condensate Infrastructure Improvements $5,000 F C340A5 ProMedica Transformative Low Income Medical Senior Housing $250,000 G C340B3 Reverse Osmosis Auto Watering System for Research Animals $526,112 H C340B9 University of Toledo Hillel $50,000 I C340C3 Campus Safety Grant Program $19,890 J C340C6 Space Replacement/Consolidation $336,514 K C340D1 Hopability - Epilepsy Center of Northwest Ohio $125,000 L Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) Total $1,317,516 M Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) N C340C1 Workforce Based Training and Equipment - Taxable $172,606 O C340C9 Research Lab Renovation - Taxable $6,097 P C340E5 Toledo Innovation Center - Taxable $450,000 Q Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) Total $628,703 R TOTAL ALL FUNDS $1,946,219 BUILDING ENVELOPE/WEATHERPROOFING The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C34080, Building Envelope/Weatherproofing, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C34080, Building Envelope/Weatherproofing, plus the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C34072, Building Automation System Upgrades, plus the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C340B2, Wireless Infrastructure Upgrade. HOPABILITY - EPILEPSY CENTER OF NORTHWEST OHIO The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C340D1, Hopability - Epilepsy Center of Northwest Ohio, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C58050, Community Support, earmarked for Uptown Smiles Clinical Renovations. Section 357.35. 1 2 3 A WTC WASHINGTON STATE COMMUNITY COLLEGE B Reappropriations C Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) D C35800 Basic Renovations $155,302 E C35807 WTC Health Sciences Center $31,904 F C35814 Main Building Door and Window Replacement/Drivit Repairs $15,318 G C35817 Campus Safety Grant Program $28,766 H C35824 Arts & Sciences Window and HVAC Upgrades $1,142,000 I Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) Total $1,373,290 J Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) K C35816 Workforce Based Training and Equipment - Taxable $154,626 L Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) Total $154,626 M TOTAL ALL FUNDS $1,527,916 ARTS & SCIENCES WINDOW AND HVAC UPGRADES The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C35824, Arts & Sciences Window and HVAC Upgrades, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C35824, Arts & Sciences Window and HVAC Upgrades, plus up to $11,779. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, Washington State Community College shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbered amounts up to $11,779 from appropriation item C35800, Basic Renovations. Section 357.36. 1 2 3 A WSU WRIGHT STATE UNIVERSITY B Reappropriations C Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) D C27570 Envelope Repairs $109,203 E C27571 Wellfield Remediation $138,344 F C27577 Workforce Based Training and Equipment $34,048 G C27578 University Safety Initiative $1,819,960 H C27579 Pedestrian Tunnel Renewal $85,208 I C27582 Campus Paving and Grounds $252,999 J C27585 Campus Energy Efficiency and Controls $245,815 K C27589 Gas Line Replacement $3,933,606 L C27590 Workforce Development Center - Lake Campus $1,517,775 M C27594 Health College Renovation $1,225,750 N C27598 405 Xenia Avenue Market Redevelopment $150,000 O C275A2 Lake Campus Infrastructure $369,538 P C275A5 Wright State University Archives Facilities Upgrade Project $100,000 Q C275A6 Infinity Labs Power House $250,000 R C275A7 Northwest Health and Wellness Campus $200,000 S C275A8 Village of Camden Technology Center $175,000 T C275A9 Campus Safety Grant Program $143,885 U C275B3 Student Union Atrium Renovation $126,299 V C275B4 Paul Laurence Dunbar Library Renovation $957,011 W C275B5 Campus Restroom Upgrades $300,000 X C275B6 Laboratory Animal Resources Occupational Safety Phase II $11,233 Y C275B9 Campus Safety Exterior Cameras and Access Control $500,000 Z C275D3 Healthy Family Market/Dayton Children's Westside Pediatric Center $500,000 AA C275D4 Aerospace, Medicine, and Human Performance National Center of Excellence - Wright State University $400,000 AB C275D5 Wright State University Archives Facilities Upgrades $250,000 AC Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) Total $13,795,674 AD Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) AE C27599 Workforce Based Training and Equipment - Taxable $31,468 AF C275A1 Fairborn Fiber Expansion Project - Taxable $75,000 AG C275C2 Energy Efficiency and Controls - Taxable $88,763 AH C275D2 University Safety Initiative - Taxable $41,958 AI C275D6 Workforce Development Center - Taxable $500,000 AJ C275D7 USAF Research Partnership - Taxable $250,000 AK Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) Total $987,189 AL TOTAL ALL FUNDS $14,782,863 UNIVERSITY SAFETY INITIATIVE The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C27578, University Safety Initiative, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C27578, University Safety Initiative, plus up to $13,623. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, Wright State University shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbered amounts up to $13,623 from appropriation item C27578, University Safety Initiative. LAKE CAMPUS INFRASTRUCTURE The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C275A2, Lake Campus Infrastructure, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C275A2, Lake Campus Infrastructure, plus up to $41,447. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, Wright State University shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbered amounts up to $41,447 from appropriation item C275A2, Lake Campus Infrastructure. Section 357.37. 1 2 3 A YSU YOUNGSTOWN STATE UNIVERSITY B Reappropriations C Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) D C34500 Basic Renovations $582,723 E C34509 Basic Renovations - Steubenville $287,837 F C34518 Campus-Wide Building Systems Upgrades $24,404 G C34523 Campus Development $7,283 H C34524 Instructional Space Upgrades $6,375 I C34541 Utility Distribution Upgrade/Expansion $73,201 J C34556 Cushwa Hall Renovation/Expansion $85,734 K C34560 Campus Roof Replacements $41,719 L C34561 Building Envelope Renovations $61,800 M C34565 IT Infrastructure Upgrades $76,132 N C34575 Building Exterior Door and Window Replacements $577,732 O C34576 Garfield Building Renovations $1,371,101 P C34577 Emergency Generator Upgrades $1,000,000 Q C34587 Ohio Hills Quaker City Health Center $100,000 R C34592 Rich Center for Autism Building Tomorrow $450,000 S C34593 YNG Aviation Education Center $350,000 T Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) Total $5,096,041 U Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) V C34503 Kilcawley Center Renovations - Taxable $97,531 W C34555 Workforce Based Training and Equipment - Taxable $364,630 X C34596 Eastern Ohio Biztown Financial Literacy & Entrepreneurship Center - Taxable $250,000 Y C34597 Regional Workforce Training and Community Center - Taxable $250,000 Z C34598 Brite Energy Innovators - Taxable $500,000 AA Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) Total $1,462,161 AB TOTAL ALL FUNDS $6,558,202 BASIC RENOVATIONS - STEUBENVILLE The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C34509, Basic Renovations - Steubenville, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C34509, Basic Renovations - Steubenville, plus up to $287,837. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, the Department of Higher Education shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbered amounts up to $117,502 from appropriation item C38623, HVAC/Plumbing Maintenance, $155,785 from appropriation item C38600, Basic Renovations, and $14,550 from appropriation item C38630, Dental Laboratory Renovation. INSTRUCTIONAL SPACE UPGRADES The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C34524, Instructional Space Upgrades, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C34524, Instructional Space Upgrades, plus the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C34514, Ward Beecher HVAC Upgrade, plus the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C34549, Ward Beecher Science Hall Renovation, plus the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C34554, Innovation/Commercial Center, plus the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C34578, STEM Science Laboratory Renovations, plus up to $12,925. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, Youngstown State University shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbered amounts up to $12,925 from appropriation item C34556, Cushwa Hall Physical Therapy Renovations/Expansion. BUILDING ENVELOPE RENOVATIONS The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C34561, Building Envelope Renovations, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C34561, Building Envelope Renovations, plus the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C34521, Masonry Restoration, plus the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C34559, Pedestrian Bridge Renovations, plus up to $23,185. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, Youngstown State University shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbered amounts up to $9,836 from appropriation item C34535, Building Exterior Repairs, and $13,349 from appropriation item C34557, Ward Beecher Science Hall Structural Improvements. Section 357.38. 1 2 3 A MAT ZANE STATE COLLEGE B Reappropriations C Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) D C36215 Workforce Based Training and Equipment $112,495 E C36218 Zanesville Campus Renovations $1,345,712 F C36233 Zane State Regional Engineering Hub $625,000 G Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) Total $2,083,207 H Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) I C36226 Workforce Based Training and Equipment - Taxable $367,182 J Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) Total $367,182 K TOTAL ALL FUNDS $2,450,389 Section 357.41. For all reappropriations in this act from the Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) or the Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) that require local funds to be contributed by any state-supported or state-assisted institution of higher education, the Department of Higher Education shall not recommend that any funds be released until the recipient institution demonstrates to the Department of Higher Education and the Office of Budget and Management that the local funds contribution requirement has been secured or satisfied. The local funds shall be in addition to the reappropriations in this act. Section 357.42. None of the capital reappropriations in this act for state-supported or state-assisted institutions of higher education shall be expended until the particular appropriation has been recommended for release by the Department of Higher Education and released by the Director of Budget and Management or the Controlling Board. Either the institution concerned, or the Department of Higher Education with the concurrence of the institution concerned, may initiate the request to the Director of Budget and Management or the Controlling Board for the release of the particular appropriation. Section 357.43. (A) No capital reappropriations in this act made from the Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) or the Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) shall be released for planning or for improvement, renovation, construction, or acquisition of capital facilities if the institution of higher education or the state does not own the real property on which the capital facilities are or will be located. This restriction does not apply in any of the following circumstances: (1) The institution has a long-term (at least twenty years) lease of, or other interest (such as an easement) in, the real property. (2) The Department of Higher Education certifies to the Controlling Board that undue delay will occur if planning does not proceed while the property or property interest acquisition process continues. In this case, funds may be released upon approval of the Controlling Board to pay for planning through the development of schematic drawings only. (3) In the case of a reappropriation for capital facilities that, because of their unique nature or location, will be owned or will be part of facilities owned by a separate nonprofit organization or public body and will be made available to the institution of higher education for its use or benefit, the nonprofit organization or public body either owns or has a long-term (at least twenty years) lease of the real property or other capital facility to be improved, renovated, constructed, or acquired and has entered into a joint or cooperative use agreement with the institution of higher education that meets the requirements of division (C) of this section. (B) Any reappropriations that require cooperation between a technical college and a branch campus of a university may be released by the Controlling Board upon recommendation by the Department of Higher Education that the facilities proposed by the institutions are: (1) The result of a joint planning effort by the university and the technical college, satisfactory to the Department of Higher Education; (2) Facilities that will meet the needs of the region in terms of technical and general education, taking into consideration the totality of facilities that will be available after the completion of the projects; (3) Planned to permit maximum joint use by the university and technical college of the totality of facilities that will be available upon their completion; and (4) To be located on or adjacent to the branch campus of the university. (C) The Department of Higher Education shall adopt and maintain rules regarding the release of moneys from all the appropriations for capital facilities for all state-supported or state-assisted institutions of higher education. In the case of capital facilities referred to in division (A)(3) of this section, the joint or cooperative use agreements shall include, as a minimum, provisions that: (1) Specify the extent and nature of that joint or cooperative use, extending for not fewer than twenty years, with the value of such use or benefit or right to use to be, as is determined by the parties and approved by the Department of Higher Education, reasonably related to the amount of the appropriations; (2) Provide for pro rata reimbursement to the state should the arrangement for joint or cooperative use be terminated prior to the expiration of its full term; (3) Provide that procedures to be followed during the capital improvement process will comply with appropriate applicable state statutes and rules, including the provisions of this act; and (4) Provide for payment or reimbursement to the institution of its administrative costs incurred as a result of the facilities project, not to exceed 1.5 percent of the appropriated amount. (D) Upon the recommendation of the Department of Higher Education, the Controlling Board may approve the transfer of appropriations for projects requiring cooperation between institutions from one institution to another institution with the approval of both institutions. (E) Notwithstanding section 127.14 of the Revised Code, the Controlling Board, upon the recommendation of the Department of Higher Education, may transfer amounts appropriated to the Department of Higher Education to accounts of state-supported or state-assisted institutions created for that same purpose. Section 357.45. The requirements of Chapters 123. and 153. of the Revised Code, with respect to the powers and duties of the Executive Director of the Ohio Facilities Construction Commission as they relate to the procedure and awarding of contracts for capital improvement projects, and the requirements of section 127.16 of the Revised Code, with respect to the Controlling Board, do not apply to projects of community college districts and technical college districts. Section 357.46. Those institutions locally administering capital improvement projects pursuant to sections 3345.50 and 3345.51 of the Revised Code may: (A) Establish charges for recovering costs directly related to project administration as defined by the Executive Director of the Ohio Facilities Construction Commission. The Ohio Facilities Construction Commission, in consultation with the Office of Budget and Management, shall review and approve these administrative charges when the charges are in excess of 1.5 percent of the total construction budget, provided that total administrative charges paid by the state do not exceed four percent of the state's contribution to the total construction budget. (B) Seek reimbursement from state capital appropriations to the institution for the in-house design services performed by the institution for the capital projects. Acceptable charges are limited to design document preparation work that is done by the institution. These reimbursable design costs shall be shown as "A/E fees" within the project's budget that is submitted to the Controlling Board or the Director of Budget and Management as part of a request for release of funds. The reimbursement for in-house design shall not exceed seven percent of the estimated construction cost. Section 357.47. TRANSFERS OF HIGHER EDUCATION CAPITAL APPROPRIATIONS The Director of Budget and Management may as necessary to maintain the exclusion from the calculation of gross income for federal income taxation purposes under the "Internal Revenue Code of 1986," 26 U.S.C. 1 et seq., with respect to obligations issued to fund projects appropriated from the Higher Education Improvement Fund: (A) Transfer appropriations between the Higher Education Improvement Fund and the Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund; (B) Create new appropriation items within the Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund and make transfers of appropriations to them for projects originally funded from appropriations made from the Higher Education Improvement Fund. The projects that are funded under new appropriation items created in this manner shall automatically be designated as specific for purposes of section 126.14 of the Revised Code. Section 359.10. 1 2 3 A ETC BROADCAST EDUCATIONAL MEDIA COMMISSION B Reappropriations C Administrative Building Fund (Fund 7026) D C37428 Ohio Public TV-Radio $55,450 E C37429 Ohio Radio Reading Services Equipment $51,000 F Administrative Building Fund (Fund 7026) Total $106,450 G Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) H C37406 Network Operations Center Upgrades $936,847 I Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) Total $936,847 J TOTAL ALL FUNDS $1,043,297 NETWORK OPERATIONS CENTER UPGRADES The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C37406, Network Operations Center Upgrades, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C37406, Network Operations Center Upgrades, plus the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C37410, Ohio Radio Reading Services. Section 361.10. 1 2 3 A CSR CAPITOL SQUARE REVIEW AND ADVISORY BOARD B Reappropriations C Administrative Building Fund (Fund 7026) D C87407 Statehouse Repair and Improvements $574,262 E C87412 Capitol Square Security $5,000,000 F Administrative Building Fund (Fund 7026) Total $5,574,262 G TOTAL ALL FUNDS $5,574,262 Section 363.10. 1 2 3 A DAS DEPARTMENT OF ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES B Reappropriations C Administrative Building Fund (Fund 7026) D C10000 Governor's Residence $3,077,660 E C10010 Office Services Building Renovations $113,435 F C10015 SOCC Renovations $1,043,396 G C10020 North High Building Complex Renovations $306,495 H C10021 Office Space Planning $7,000,000 I C10042 IT Projects $995,489 J C10051 Fleet Sustainability $500,000 K Administrative Building Fund (Fund 7026) Total $13,036,475 L Administrative Building Taxable Bond Fund (Fund 7016) M C10041 MARCS - Taxable $9,056,200 N C10052 Symmes Valley Tower Project in Lawrence County $214,000 O C10057 Medina County Radio System - Seville Tower $100,000 P Administrative Building Taxable Bond Fund (Fund 7016) Total $9,370,200 Q Building Improvement Fund (Fund 5KZ0) R C10035 Building Improvement $10,000,000 S Building Improvement Fund (Fund 5KZ0) Total $10,000,000 T TOTAL ALL FUNDS $32,406,675 IT PROJECTS The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C10042, IT Projects, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C10042, IT Projects, plus up to $128,755. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, the Department of Administrative Services shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbered amounts up to $128,755 from appropriation item C10042, IT Projects. MARCS - TAXABLE The foregoing appropriation item C10041, MARCS - Taxable, shall be used to purchase or construct the components of MARCS that are not specific to any one agency. The equipment may include, but is not limited to, computer and telecommunications equipment used for the functioning and integration of the system, communications towers, tower sites, tower equipment, and linkages among towers. The Director of Administrative Services shall determine the specific use of funds. Expenditures from this appropriation shall not be subject to Chapters 123. and 153. of the Revised Code. The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C10041, MARCS - Taxable, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C10041, MARCS - Taxable, plus up to $39,583. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, the Department of Administrative Services shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbered amounts up to $39,583 from appropriation item C10041, MARCS - Taxable. BUILDING IMPROVEMENT The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C10035, Building Improvement, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C10035, Building Improvement, plus up to $111,746. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, the Department of Administrative Services shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbered amounts up to $111,746 from appropriation item C10035, Building Improvement. Section 365.10. 1 2 3 A AGR DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE B Reappropriations C Administrative Building Fund (Fund 7026) D C70007 Building and Grounds Renovations $7,807,835 E C70022 Agricultural Society Facilities $100,000 F C70024 Building #22 Renovation $992,821 G C70030 Agriculture Equipment $416,504 H C70033 Animal Disease Laboratory $4,252,343 I Administrative Building Fund (Fund 7026) Total $13,569,503 J Clean Ohio Agricultural Easement Fund (Fund 7057) K C70009 Clean Ohio Agricultural Easement Fund $15,980,966 L Clean Ohio Agricultural Easement Fund (Fund 7057) Total $15,980,966 M TOTAL ALL FUNDS $29,550,469 BUILDING AND GROUNDS RENOVATIONS The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C70007, Building and Grounds Renovations, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C70007, Building and Grounds Renovations, plus up to $255,186. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, the Department of Agriculture shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbered amounts up to $255,186 from appropriation item C70007, Building and Grounds Renovations. Section 365.15. AGRICULTURAL SOCIETY FACILITIES The foregoing appropriation item C70022, Agricultural Society Facilities, shall be used to support the projects in this section. 1 2 A Project List B Columbiana County Junior Fair Agriculture and Event Center $100,000 Section 367.10. 1 2 3 A COM DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE B Reappropriations C Capital IT Fund (Fund 7091) D C80041 Data Analytics $1,400,000 E Capital IT Fund (Fund 7091) Total $1,400,000 F Division Of Administration Fund (Fund 1630) G C80048 IT Infrastructure, Applications, and Improvements $1,300,000 H Division Of Administration Fund (Fund 1630) Total $1,300,000 I State Fire Marshal Fund (Fund 5460) J C80005 IT Infrastructure $1,200,000 K C80023 SFM Renovations and Improvements $974,650 L C80034 Fire Training Apparatus $2,060,317 M C80040 Green Township Department - CPR $15,000 N C80042 Fire Training Structure $3,460,467 O State Fire Marshal Fund (Fund 5460) Total $7,710,434 P TOTAL ALL FUNDS $10,410,434 Section 369.10. 1 2 3 A DDD DEPARTMENT OF DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES B Reappropriations C Mental Health Facilities Improvement Fund (Fund 7033) D C59034 Statewide Developmental Centers $12,500,000 E C59077 Vocational Guidance Services Workforce Center $300,000 F C59084 Opportunity for All Building - Community Recreation Center for the Developmentally Disabled $200,000 G C59087 STEAM and Sensory Motor/Stress Relief for Children and Teachers $25,000 H C59093 Inclusive Multigenerational Community and Recreation Center (IMCRC) $1,000,000 I C59094 Ken Anderson Alliance Building Improvements $25,000 J Mental Health Facilities Improvement Fund (Fund 7033) Total $14,050,000 K TOTAL ALL FUNDS $14,050,000 KEN ANDERSON ALLIANCE BUILDING IMPROVEMENTS The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C59094, Ken Anderson Alliance Building Improvements, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C58050, Community Support, earmarked for The Commons at Springfield. Section 370.10. 1 2 3 A DOH DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH B Reappropriations C Capital IT Fund (Fund 7091) D C44001 IT Equipment and Software $1,506,860 E Capital IT Fund (Fund 7091) Total $1,506,860 F TOTAL ALL FUNDS $1,506,860 Section 371.10. 1 2 3 A MHA DEPARTMENT OF BEHAVIORAL HEALTH B Reappropriations C Mental Health Facilities Improvement Fund (Fund 7033) D C58001 Community Assistance Projects $20,775,720 E C58007 Infrastructure Renovations $90,731,528 F C58048 Community Resiliency Projects $7,388,043 G C58050 Community Support $26,178,235 H Mental Health Facilities Improvement Fund (Fund 7033) Total $145,073,526 I TOTAL ALL FUNDS $145,073,526 Section 371.13. COMMUNITY ASSISTANCE PROJECTS The foregoing appropriation item C58001, Community Assistance Projects, may be used for facilities constructed or to be constructed pursuant to Chapter 340., 5119., 5123., or 5126. of the Revised Code or the authority granted by section 154.20 and other applicable sections of the Revised Code and the rules issued pursuant to those chapters and that section. The appropriation shall be distributed by the Department of Behavioral Health subject to Controlling Board approval. Section 371.15. INFRASTRUCTURE RENOVATIONS The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C58007, Infrastructure Renovations, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C58007, Infrastructure Renovations, plus up to $351,759. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, the Department of Behavioral Health shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbered amounts up to $179,459 from appropriation item C58007, Infrastructure Renovations, $72,796 from appropriation item C58008, Emergency Improvements, and $99,505 from appropriation item C58010, Campus Consolidation. COMMUNITY RESILIENCY PROJECTS The foregoing appropriation item, C58048, Community Resiliency Projects, shall be used in support of the establishment, expansion, and renovation of programming spaces for individuals affected by behavioral health related issues, specifically targeting, to the extent possible, programming spaces for middle and high school age youth affected by behavioral health related issues. Funds shall be awarded to projects through a process to be developed by the Department of Behavioral Health that may take into account, but is not limited to, the following factors: the poverty rate of the community in which the facility is to be located, the breadth and nature of the plan to engage a broad spectrum of at-risk youth, support of community partners, readiness of the funding applicant to move forward with the project, and the array of supportive programming to be offered by the applicant. All projects shall comply with the community project standards and guidelines of the Department of Behavioral Health. Section 371.20. COMMUNITY SUPPORT The foregoing appropriation item C58050, Community Support, shall be equal to the amount of all projects specified in this section, unless the amounts are released prior to June 30, 2026. The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C58050, Community Support, earmarked for Harbor Behavioral Health, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C24073, Mercy College of Ohio Physician Assistant Program. 1 2 A Project List B Gracehaven-Multipurpose Building $2,500,000 C Cuyahoga County Mental Health Diversion Center $1,700,000 D Cleveland Christian Home - Child Wellness Campus $1,500,000 E Bellefaire Jewish Children's Bureau Child and Youth Service Center $1,000,000 F Dayton Boys and Girls Club (Miami Chapel Inspire Zone) $1,000,000 G Greater Dayton Regional Hospital Association $800,000 H Bellefaire Child and Youth Services Center $750,000 I LADD Forever Home $720,000 J Providence House East Side Campus Community Hub $700,000 K Cleveland Clinic Akron General $700,000 L Faith Mission Life Safety and Critical Improvements $560,000 M Toledo YWCA Domestic Shelter Project $500,000 N Whitney Manor $500,000 O Vista Village $500,000 P Ravenwood Health Renovation $500,000 Q Clark County Family Justice Center $500,000 R Tri-County Response Center Project $500,000 S Tri-County Board of Recovery and Mental Health Services $450,000 T Applewood Centers Inc. $425,000 U Providence House $400,000 V May Dugan Center Renovation $400,000 W Integrated Community Solutions Community Center $350,000 X Shelby Health & Wellness Renovation Project $350,000 Y Alvis House $300,000 Z Journey Center for Safety and Healing $300,000 AA Western Reserve Area on Aging $300,000 AB Cleveland Rape Crisis Center $250,000 AC Cedar Hills Transformation Camp $250,000 AD Sisters of Charity Health System and Sisters of Charity Foundation of Cleveland $250,000 AE Lower Lights Christian Health Center $250,000 AF Alliance Area Domestic Violence Shelter $250,000 AG Alliance YWCA Headquarters Improvements $250,000 AH The Refuge - New Building $250,000 AI Tobacco Treatment Center of Ohio $250,000 AJ Wayfinders Ohio Emergency Homeless Shelter $250,000 AK Adams County $250,000 AL YWCA Greater Cincinnati Domestic Violence Shelter East $250,000 AM Center for Addiction Treatment Recovery House $250,000 AN Addiction Services Council Facility Expansion $230,000 AO Richland County Shelter Renovation Project $217,235 AP Cincinnati Children's Hospital Youth Mental Health Facility $210,000 AQ West Dayton Community Services Center (Easter Seals Miami Valley) $200,000 AR Union Miles Development Corp (Walt Collins Veterans Housing Facility) $200,000 AS Star House $200,000 AT CommQuest Recovery Campus Improvements $200,000 AU Child Guidance & Family Solutions (CGFS) - Akron Project $200,000 AV Sanctuary Night - Expanding to Meet the Need $200,000 AW Child Guidance & Family Solutions (CGFS) $200,000 AX Washington County Boys and Girls Club $175,000 AY Y-Haven YMCA of Greater Cleveland $150,000 AZ Pathways for Women $150,000 BA OhioGuidestone Youth and Family Resiliency Center $150,000 BB City of Franklin $150,000 BC Square One Meigs $150,000 BD Harbor Behavioral Health $125,000 BE Lorain County Safe Harbor $115,000 BF Henry County $110,000 BG Seven Hills Trauma Recovery Center $105,000 BH Shelby Mercy Mission House Renovations $101,000 BI Comprehensive Health Care at the Centers, Gordon Square $100,000 BJ Y-Haven YWCA of Greater Cleveland $100,000 BK Livingston Avenue Community New Direction Project $100,000 BL The Cocoon Project for Survivors of Domestic and Sexual Violence $100,000 BM Beyond the Walls $100,000 BN Blue Line Foundation HQ & Regional Training Center $100,000 BO Haven Home Renovations $100,000 BP Mansfield Champions for Children Child Advocacy Center $100,000 BQ Toledo Lutheran Social Services Expansion Project $100,000 BR CommQuest $100,000 BS Women's Resource Center of Hancock County $100,000 BT YMCA Competitive Sports Training Facility $75,000 BU Muskingum Behavioral Health Improvements $57,000 BV Veterans Resource Center Project $50,000 BW Cadence Care Network Family and Community Resource Center $50,000 BX Harbor Crisis Stabilization Unit $50,000 BY Homesafe - Ashtabula $40,000 BZ Riveon Mental Health and Recovery – Middleburg Heights $13,000 Section 373.10. 1 2 3 A DNR DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES B Reappropriations C Administrative Building Fund (Fund 7026) D C725D5 Fountain Square Building Improvements $2,185,561 E C725E0 ODNR Fairgrounds Areas Upgrading $109,545 F C725N7 District Office Renovations $276,420 G Administrative Building Fund (Fund 7026) Total $2,571,526 H Clean Ohio Trail Fund (Fund 7061) I C72514 Clean Ohio Trail Fund $3,841,416 J Clean Ohio Trail Fund (Fund 7061) Total $3,841,416 K Ohio Parks and Natural Resources Fund (Fund 7031) L C72549 ODNR Facilities Development $2,063,611 M C725E1 Local Parks Projects - Statewide $686,330 N C725E5 Project Planning $1,225,000 O C725J0 Natural Areas/Preserves Maintenance/Facilities $1,124,081 P C725J6 Ohio and Erie Canal $3,285,000 Q C725K0 State Park Renovations and Upgrading $2,513,319 R C725M0 Dam Rehabilitation $51,826 S Ohio Parks and Natural Resources Fund (Fund 7031) Total $10,949,167 T Parks and Recreation Improvement Fund (Fund 7035) U C725A0 State Parks Campgrounds, Lodges, and Cabins $31,247,561 V C725C4 Muskingum River Lock and Dam $17,417,077 W C725E2 Local Parks, Recreation, and Conservation Projects $50,952,525 X C725E6 Project Planning $5,000 Y C725L8 Statewide Trails Program $18,907,428 Z C725M5 Lake Erie Islands State Park/Middle Bass Island State Park $11,747 AA C725N6 Wastewater/Water Systems Upgrades $94,065 AB C725R3 State Parks Renovations and Upgrades $17,052,040 AC C725R4 Dam Rehabilitation - Parks $18,889,505 AD C725U4 Operations Equipment $8,796,400 AE C725U9 Recreation Facilities $11,066,588 AF Parks and Recreation Improvement Fund (Fund 7035) Total $174,439,936 AG State Fiscal Recovery Fund (Fund 5CV3) AH C725V4 Parks ARPA $932,140 AI C725V5 Trails ARPA $76,627 AJ C725V6 Wastewater/Water Systems ARPA $302,681 AK State Fiscal Recovery Fund (Fund 5CV3) Total $1,311,448 AL Wildlife Fund (Fund 7015) AM C725K9 Wildlife Area Building Renovations $40,988,784 AN Wildlife Fund (Fund 7015) Total $40,988,784 AO TOTAL ALL FUNDS $234,102,277 FEDERAL REIMBURSEMENT All reimbursements received from the federal government for any expenditures made pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the state treasury to the credit of the fund from which the expenditure originated. CLEAN OHIO TRAIL FUND The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C72514, Clean Ohio Trail Fund, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C72514, Clean Ohio Trail Fund, plus up to $3,466,877. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, the Department of Natural Resources shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbered amounts up to $3,466,877 from appropriation item C72514, Clean Ohio Trail Fund. ODNR FAIRGROUNDS AREAS UPGRADING The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C725E0, ODNR Fairgrounds Areas Upgrading, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C725E0, ODNR Fairgrounds Areas Upgrading, plus up to $200,170. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, the Department of Natural Resources shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbered amounts up to $113,218 from appropriation item C725D5, Fountain Square Building Improvements, and $86,952 from appropriation item C725N7, District Office Renovations. STATE PARK RENOVATIONS AND UPGRADING The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C725K0, State Park Renovations and Upgrading, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C725K0, State Park Renovations and Upgrading, plus up to $836,383. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, the Department of Natural Resources shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbered amounts up to $19,881 from appropriation item C72549, ODNR Facilities Development, $367,941 from appropriation item C725E1, Local Parks Projects - Statewide, $7,137 from appropriation item C725K0, State Park Renovations and Upgrading, $429,182 from appropriation item C725M0, Dam Rehabilitation, and $12,242 from appropriation item C725N5, Wastewater/Water Systems Upgrades. STATE PARKS RENOVATIONS AND UPGRADES The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C725R3, State Parks Renovations and Upgrades, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C725R3, State Parks Renovations and Upgrades, plus up to $8,348,822. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, the Department of Natural Resources shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbered amounts up to $6,185,743 from appropriation item C725A0, State Parks Campgrounds, Lodges, and Cabins, $24,960 from appropriation item C725B2, Parks Equipment, $33,377 from appropriation item C725B5, Buckeye Lake Dam Rehabilitation, $5,923 from appropriation item C725C4, Muskingum River Lock and Dam, $13,327 from appropriation item C725E6, Project Planning, $21,813 from appropriation item C725L8, Statewide Trails Program, $179,725 from appropriation item C725N6, Wastewater/Water Systems Upgrades, $112,826 from appropriation item C725R3, State Parks Renovations and Upgrades, and $1,771,128 from appropriation item C725R4, Dam Rehabilitation - Parks. Section 373.15. The foregoing appropriation item C725E2, Local Parks, Recreation, and Conservation Projects, shall be equal to the amount of all unreleased local parks projects and allowable administrative costs specified in this section, unless amounts are released prior to June 30, 2026. Of the foregoing appropriation item C725E2, Local Parks, Recreation, and Conservation Projects, an amount equal to two percent of the projects listed below that received their initial appropriation prior to the effective date of this section may be used by the Department of Natural Resources for the administration of local projects, except that the Department shall not use any portion of the funding for those projects whose reappropriation has been redirected in this section from the unencumbered balance of another appropriation item. The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C725E2, Local Parks, Recreation, and Conservation Projects, earmarked for the Champion City Sports and Wellness Center is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C230FM, Cultural and Sports Facilities Projects, earmarked for A.B. Graham Memorial at I-70 and SR 72. The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C725E2, Local Parks, Recreation, and Conservation Projects, earmarked for Dublin Riverside Crossing Park is the unencumbered balance as of June 20, 2026, in appropriation item C230FM, Cultural and Sports Facilities Projects, earmarked for the Brown-Harris Historic Cemetery Preservation. The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C725E2, Local Parks, Recreation, and Conservation Projects, earmarked for Brooklyn John M. Coyne Center Improvements is the unencumbered balance remaining in appropriation item C230Z8, Brooklyn John Frey Park, as of June 20, 2026. The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C725E2, Local Parks, Recreation, and Conservation Projects, earmarked for the City of Vandalia Robinette Park Renovation, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C230EC, Triumph of Flight. The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C725E2, Local Parks, Recreation, and Conservation Projects, includes the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C270N4, East Liverpool Athletic Center. 1 2 A Project List B Heritage Trail Extension $2,500,000 C Cheryl Allen Center Improvements $2,000,000 D Cleveland Tower City and Bedrock Development Activities $2,000,000 E Smale Riverfront Park $1,700,000 F West Liberty W. Columbus St. Bridge $1,265,000 G Cincinnati Findlay Community and Recreation Center $1,200,000 H Gateway to Freedom Park $1,200,000 I French Creek Sports Complex $1,075,000 J Hoover Reservoir Crew $1,000,000 K Walnut Township Flood Mitigation Project - Final Design and Implementation Plan $1,000,000 L South Point Community Pool $1,000,000 M The Wilds RV Park and Campground $900,000 N Irishtown Bend and Canal Basin Park $765,000 O Upper Arlington Riverside Drive Shared Use Path $750,000 P Detroit Shoreway Project $750,000 Q Environmental Education Pavilion at Forest Lawn Stormwater Park $750,000 R Champion City Sports and Wellness Center $750,000 S Price Hill Sports Complex $650,000 T Greater Dayton School Project $600,000 U Battery Park Coastal Improvements $500,000 V Lake Metro Parks Lakefront Trail $500,000 W North Ridgeville Mills Creek $500,000 X Oak Harbor Waterfront $500,000 Y Mid Ohio Valley Aquatic Center, Inc. (MOVAC) $500,000 Z Sidney Feeder Canal Bike Trail $500,000 AA Plain City-Heritage Trail Connector $500,000 AB Bradfield Community Recreation Center $480,000 AC Geneva Township Park - Old Lake Road Shoreline Restoration $450,000 AD Mentor Marsh Observation Tower $450,000 AE Lexington Depot Park and Trailhead $425,000 AF Mosquito Creek Lake Park Improvements $404,000 AG Buckeye Lake Feeder Channel Restoration $400,000 AH Solon to Chagrin Falls Multi-Purpose Trail $400,000 AI Kelleys Island East Lakeshore Shoreline Protection $400,000 AJ City of Grove City Town Center Playground $400,000 AK Lake Metroparks Lake Erie Shoreline Trail and Revetment Wall $400,000 AL Fairlawn connector trails $400,000 AM Wapakoneta Parking and Pedestrian Plaza Project $380,000 AN Boeckling Building Pier $350,000 AO Alum Creek Pedestrian/Bike Bridge - Bexley $350,000 AP Wauseon Community Social and Recreational Center $350,000 AQ Fairport Harbor Marina Boat Launch $350,000 AR Gateway Regional Sports Complex $350,000 AS Put-in-Bay Downtown Promenade Renovation $350,000 AT Copley Road Trail East $350,000 AU Sheffield Village French Creek Project $325,000 AV Marina Boat Dock Riverside Renovation $300,000 AW Solon-Chagrin Falls Multi-purpose Trail $300,000 AX Final Third Foundation's Pathways Park Facility Development $400,000 AY Scout Achievement Center $300,000 AZ Wadsworth Inclusive Playground at Valley View Elementary $300,000 BA Glenford Earthworks Phase III $300,000 BB Camp Joy $300,000 BC The Harold D. Miller Park Improvement Project $300,000 BD Dublin Riverside Crossing Park $255,225 BE Heights to Hudson Trail $250,000 BF Coke Oven Community Civic Center Park $250,000 BG Canal Basin Park - Riverfront Connections $250,000 BH SPIRE Institute and Academy $250,000 BI Village of Minerva Park Trail Improvement Project $250,000 BJ Roadway and Recreation Walking Track Repair $250,000 BK Johnstown Splash Pad $250,000 BL Black River School Playground Surface and Walking Track $250,000 BM Putnam County Historical Society Museum $250,000 BN Plain Township Legacy Park Amphitheater $250,000 BO Vienna Air Heritage Park $250,000 BP Mid-Ohio Aquatic Center $250,000 BQ Beverly Island Park Bridge $250,000 BR Lockington Trail Bridge $250,000 BS J. Babe Stern Ball Field $250,000 BT Timken Gatehouse Renovation $250,000 BU City of Vandalia Robinette Park Renovation $250,000 BV JCC of Greater Columbus $243,000 BW Cave Lake Dam $225,000 BX Chillicothe Paint Creek Recreational Trail $215,000 BY Lawrence County Union Rome Trails and Walkways $214,000 BZ Mandel Jewish Community Center Preston's H.O.P.E Playground $210,000 CA Bradstreet's Landing Pier, Lakefront Access and Resiliency Improvements $200,000 CB City of Monroe Lookout Point $200,000 CC Union and Rome Township Trails Project $200,000 CD Munson Springs Nature Preserve and Historical Site $200,000 CE Shared Use Path Connector (Goosepond Road-Licking Health Department) $200,000 CF Lorain County Metro Park Connector $200,000 CG Sidney Urbana Trail System Phase I $200,000 CH Mount Aloysius Community Rec Center $200,000 CI East Liverpool Heritage Trail Project $185,000 CJ Radnor Township Park Improvements $160,000 CK Center Green Stream Restoration Project $150,000 CL McNamara Park Project $150,000 CM Pickerington Soccer Association Facility Improvements $150,000 CN Wellsville Marina Dredging $150,000 CO Findlay Playground/Grant Park/Over-the-Rhine Recreation Center $150,000 CP Swanton Railroad Park $150,000 CQ Antrim Community Center $150,000 CR Mill Creek Valley Conservancy District Corridor Revitalization $150,000 CS Forest Park Central Park Improvements $150,000 CT Buckeye Lake Boat Ramps and Pier Enabling Project $150,000 CU J. Babe Stern Community Center for At Risk Children $150,000 CV Mount Gilead Park Site Preparations $150,000 CW Summit Lake Vision Plan $150,000 CX Mansfield Central Park $150,000 CY Recreational Project at the Bowling Green Training and Community Center $150,000 CZ CROWN Ohio River Trail Safety Improvements $140,000 DA Centerville Mills Park Wetland Boardwalk and Trails System $125,000 DB Old Murray City School Building Demolition $125,000 DC Flight Line: East Dayton Rails-to-Trails $125,000 DD Fairlawn Gully Water Quality Basins $125,000 DE City of Poland Sheridan Rd. Multi-Use Trail $107,000 DF Minister-Ft. Loramie Multi-Use Trail Connector $100,000 DG The Pony Wagon Trail $100,000 DH Addyston Park Upgrades $100,000 DI Miracle Field Complex $100,000 DJ Veterans Memorial at Rose Run Park $100,000 DK Mitchell Park Trail Connector $100,000 DL Fairfax Ziegler Park Improvements $100,000 DM Columbia Twp. Wooster Pike Bike Trail $100,000 DN Holden Arboretum All-Season Trails $100,000 DO Avon Lake Boat Launch and Park Improvements $100,000 DP Syracuse Doggie Park $100,000 DQ The Wilds Shade and Shelter Improvements $100,000 DR Paulding County Trails Project $100,000 DS Brunswick Hills Township Park $100,000 DT Mound Park Pickleball and Tennis Court Resurfacing Project $100,000 DU Ottawa Memorial Pool Splash Pad $100,000 DV Village of Bellville Historic Bandstand Renovations $100,000 DW Brooklyn John M. Coyne Center Improvements $90,000 DX Hart Crane Park $85,000 DY YMCA of Bucyrus Aquatic Center $80,000 DZ 4-H Camp Piedmont Upgrades $75,000 EA Bacci Park Infrastructure and Security Improvements $75,000 EB Geneva-on-the-Lake Shoreline Protection Project $75,000 EC Brook Park Central Park $75,000 ED Independence Hemlock Trail $75,000 EE Middleport-Pomeroy Walking Path Project Phase IV $75,000 EF New Concord Swimming Pool $75,000 EG Sharon Nature Preserve Trails Phase I $75,000 EH Boston Heights - Matthew Thomas Park Trail $75,000 EI Summit Lake Vision Plan $75,000 EJ Hiestand Woods Park and Preserve $75,000 EK Madeira Dawson Promenade Connector $70,000 EL Ellsworth Hills Learning Lab $65,000 EM Continental Buckeye Park Improvements $60,000 EN Holden Arboretum $50,000 EO Jeromesville Square Park $50,000 EP Shade Community Center Upgrades $50,000 EQ Barge 225 - Cleveland Metroparks Floating Education Center $50,000 ER Clague Park Cabin Renovation $50,000 ES Bellaire Walking Trail $50,000 ET Big Walnut Trail Extension and Park $50,000 EU Big Walnut Trail SE Columbus - Eastland Area $50,000 EV Kelley Nature Preserve Boat Ramp $50,000 EW Drews Trak Memorial Pump Track Expansion $50,000 EX P&G MLB Cincinnati Reds Youth Academy $50,000 EY Salt Fork State Park $50,000 EZ Center Ice Foundation $50,000 FA Avon Lake Veterans Park Gazebo $50,000 FB Pomeroy Multimodal Path $50,000 FC Keener Park Renovations/Pickleball Courts $50,000 FD Brunswick Lake ADA Canoe/Kayak Launch $50,000 FE Camp Sherman Park $50,000 FF Village of Bloomdale Reservoir Project $50,000 FG Milford Center Rail Depot $50,000 FH Adena Golden Wave Stadium Renovation $49,000 FI Selby Building Revitalization $45,000 FJ Village of Dunkirk Splash Pad and Storage Building $45,000 FK Bruce L Chapin Bridge - Northcoast Inland Trail $45,000 FL Burr Oak State Park $44,000 FM East Liverpool Splash Pad $40,000 FN Chippewa Park Shelter House $40,000 FO Nimisilla Park Excavating $40,000 FP Rittman Splash Pad $40,000 FQ Jeromesville Community Garden $35,000 FR Monroeville Clark Park - North Coast Inland Trail Connection $33,000 FS Antwerp Village Community Park $33,000 FT Camp McKinley Improvements $30,000 FU Keener Park Sledding Hill $30,000 FV Village of Weston Community Splash Pad $30,000 FW Rayland Friendship Park Restroom Project $25,000 FX Charlement Reservation Stable $25,000 FY Gloria Glens Southwest Park Grading $25,000 FZ Willshire Ballpark Enhancements $25,000 GA Osgood Tennis Court $20,000 GB Clifton to Yellow Springs Bike Trail $20,000 GC Rockford Community Improvements $18,000 GD Wakeman Trail Connector $17,000 GE Sardinia Veteran's Community Park Revitalization $15,000 GF Seville Memorial Park Public Restroom Facilities $15,000 GG Village of Albany Bike Paths $10,000 GH Paulding County Trails Project $7,500 GI Buckeye Trail Boesel Easement Bridge $2,800 Section 373.20. For the projects for which reappropriations are made in this act from the Parks and Recreation Improvement Fund (Fund 7035), the Department of Natural Resources shall periodically prepare and submit to the Director of Budget and Management the estimated design, planning, and engineering costs of capital-related work to be done by the Department of Natural Resources for each project. Based on the estimates, the Director of Budget and Management may release appropriations from appropriation item C725E6, Project Planning, within Fund 7035, to pay for design, planning, and engineering costs incurred by the Department of Natural Resources for the projects. Upon release of the appropriations by the Director of Budget and Management, the Department of Natural Resources shall pay for these expenses from the Parks Capital Expenses Fund (Fund 2270), and be reimbursed by Fund 7035 using an intrastate voucher. Section 373.30. For the projects for which reappropriations are made in this act from the Ohio Parks and Natural Resources Fund (Fund 7031), the Ohio Department of Natural Resources shall periodically prepare and submit to the Director of Budget and Management the estimated design, planning, and engineering costs of capital-related work to be done by the Department of Natural Resources for each project. Based on those estimates, the Director of Budget and Management may release appropriations from appropriation item C725E5, Project Planning, within Fund 7031 to pay for design, planning, and engineering costs incurred by the Department of Natural Resources for the projects. Upon release of the appropriations by the Director of Budget and Management, the Department of Natural Resources shall pay for these expenses from the Capital Expenses Fund (Fund 4S90) and be reimbursed by Fund 7031 using an intrastate voucher. Section 374.10. 1 2 3 A TAX DEPARTMENT OF TAXATION B Reappropriations C Administrative Building Fund (Fund 7026) D C11001 Enhanced Electronic Filing $397,000 E Administrative Building Fund (Fund 7026) Total $397,000 F TOTAL ALL FUNDS $397,000 Section 377.10. 1 2 3 A DPS DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC SAFETY B Reappropriations C Administrative Building Fund (Fund 7026) D C76000 Platform Scales Improvements $550,000 E C76035 Alum Creek Facilities Renovations and Improvements $75,000 F C76036 ODPS Hilltop Complex $5,500,000 G C76044 Patrol District Headquarters Post Renovation and Improvement $50,000 H C76045 Ohio State Highway Patrol Academy Renovation and Improvement $5,000 I C76049 EMA Building Renovation and Improvement $700,000 J Administrative Building Fund (Fund 7026) Total $6,880,000 K TOTAL ALL FUNDS $6,880,000 PATROL DISTRICT HEADQUARTERS POST RENOVATION AND IMPROVEMENT The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C76044, Patrol District Headquarters Post Renovation and Improvement, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C76044, Patrol District Headquarters Post Renovation and Improvement, plus the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C76050, OSHP Dispatch Center Renovations and Improvements. Section 379.10. 1 2 3 A DRC DEPARTMENT OF REHABILITATION AND CORRECTION B Reappropriations C Adult Correctional Building Fund (Fund 7027) D C50100 Local Jails $126,302 E C50101 Community-Based Correctional Facilities $557,176 F C50105 Water System/Plant Improvements $4,872,368 G C50136 General Building Renovation $35,000,000 H C501HO Medina County Sheriff Jail Safety Enhancement $100,000 I C501HP Ashtabula County Public Safety Center Security Upgrades $250,000 J Adult Correctional Building Fund (Fund 7027) Total $40,905,846 K Capital IT Fund (Fund 7091) L C501HF ID Domain Migration and Key Watcher Upgrades $5,000,000 M Capital IT Fund (Fund 7091) Total $5,000,000 N TOTAL ALL FUNDS $45,905,846 GENERAL BUILDING RENOVATIONS The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C50136, General Building Renovations, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C50136, General Building Renovation, plus up to $6,181,116. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, the Department of Rehabilitation and Correction shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbered amounts up to $48,175 from appropriation item C50101, Community-Based Correctional Facilities, $77,452 from appropriation item C50105, Water System/Plant Improvements, $15,292 from appropriation item C50114, Community Residential Program, and $6,040,199 from appropriation item C50136, General Building Renovation. LOCAL JAILS The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C50100, Local Jails, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C50100, Local Jails, plus up to $323,879. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, the Department of Rehabilitation and Correction shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbered amounts up to $323,879 from appropriation item C50100, Local Jails. Section 379.20. LOCAL JAILS The foregoing appropriation item C50100, Local Jails, shall be used for the construction and renovation of county jails. The Department of Rehabilitation and Correction shall designate the projects involving the construction and renovation of county jails. The Department of Rehabilitation and Correction may review and approve the renovation and construction of projects for which funds are provided. The proceeds of any obligations authorized under this section shall not be applied to any such facilities that are not designated and approved by the Department of Rehabilitation and Correction. The Department of Rehabilitation and Correction shall adopt guidelines to accept and review applications and designate projects. The guidelines shall require the county or counties to justify the need for the project and to comply with timelines for the submission of documentation pertaining to the project and project location. In reviewing applications and designating projects, the Department of Rehabilitation and Correction shall prioritize applications and projects that: (1) Target county jails that the Department of Rehabilitation and Correction determines to have the greatest need for construction or renovation work; (2) Improve substantially the condition, safety, and operational ability of the jail; and (3) Benefit jails that are, or will be, used by multiple counties. Section 379.25. COMMUNITY-BASED CORRECTIONAL FACILITIES For capital reappropriations in this act made from appropriation item C50101, Community-Based Correctional Facilities, the Department of Rehabilitation and Correction shall designate the projects involving the construction and renovation of single-county and district community-based correctional facilities. The Department of Rehabilitation and Correction may review and approve the renovation and construction of projects for which funds are provided. The proceeds of any obligations authorized under this section shall not be applied to any such facilities that are not designated and approved by the Department of Rehabilitation and Correction. The Department of Rehabilitation and Correction shall adopt guidelines to accept and review applications and designate projects. The guidelines shall require the county or counties to justify the need for the facility and to comply with timelines for the submission of documentation pertaining to the site, program, and construction. Section 379.30. COMMUNITY RESIDENTIAL PROGRAM RENOVATIONS Capital reappropriations in this act made from appropriation item C50114, Community Residential Program, may be used by the Department of Rehabilitation and Correction, pursuant to sections 5120.103 to 5120.105 of the Revised Code, to provide for the construction or renovation of halfway house facilities for offenders eligible for community supervision by the Department of Rehabilitation and Correction. Section 381.10. 1 2 3 A DVS DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS SERVICES B Reappropriations C Administrative Building Fund (Fund 7026) D C90085 Veterans' Home Renovation $2,155,000 E Administrative Building Fund (Fund 7026) Total $2,155,000 F Nursing Home - Federal Fund (Fund 3190) G C90074 Sandusky Renovation Federal $3,917,033 H C90077 Georgetown Renovation Federal $8,382,439 I Nursing Home - Federal Fund (Fund 3190) Total $12,299,472 J Ohio Veterans' Home Improvement Fund (Fund 6040) K C90073 Sandusky Equipment State $807,888 L C90075 Sandusky Renovation State $2,706,795 M C90076 Georgetown Equipment State $541,649 N C90078 Georgetown Renovation State $3,303,620 O Ohio Veterans' Home Improvement Fund (Fund 6040) Total $7,359,952 P TOTAL ALL FUNDS $21,814,424 SANDUSKY RENOVATION FEDERAL The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C90074, Sandusky Renovation Federal, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C90074, Sandusky Renovation Federal, plus the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation items C90065, Georgetown Resident Safety and Fire Alarm Replacement, C90067, Sandusky Veterans Hall HVAC Mechanical Upgrade, C90080, Georgetown Facility Addition Federal, and C90082, Information Technology Federal, plus up to $110,609. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, the Department of Veterans Services shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbered amounts up to $85,382 from appropriation item C90074, Sandusky Renovation Federal, and $25,227 from appropriation item C90077, Georgetown Renovation Federal. SANDUSKY RENOVATION STATE The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C90075, Sandusky Renovation State, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C90075, Sandusky Renovation State, plus the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation items C90066, Sandusky Veterans Hall HVAC Mechanical Upgrades, C90079, Georgetown Facility Addition State, and C90081, Information Technology State, plus up to $64,934. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, the Department of Veterans Services shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbered amounts up to $35,078 from appropriation item C90064, Georgetown Resident Safety and Fire Alarm Replacement, and $29,856 from appropriation item C90075, Sandusky Renovation State. GEORGETOWN RENOVATION STATE The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C90078, Georgetown Renovation State, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C90078, Georgetown Renovation State, plus up to $63,617. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, the Department of Veterans Services shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbered amounts up to $63,617 from appropriation item C90078, Georgetown Renovation State. Section 383.10. 1 2 3 A DYS DEPARTMENT OF YOUTH SERVICES B Reappropriations C Juvenile Correctional Building Fund (Fund 7028) D C47002 General Institutional Renovations $7,500,000 E C47003 Community Rehabilitation Centers $31,091,223 F C47007 Local Juvenile Detention Centers $350,841 G C47032 Facility Construction $110,916,265 H C47033 Lucas County Juvenile Justice Center/Youth Treatment Center Upgrades $100,000 I Juvenile Correctional Building Fund (Fund 7028) Total $149,958,329 J TOTAL ALL FUNDS $149,958,329 GENERAL INSTITUTIONAL RENOVATIONS The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C47002, General Institutional Renovations, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C47002, General Institutional Renovations, plus the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C47001, Fire Suppression, Safety, and Security. COMMUNITY REHABILITATION CENTERS The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C47003, Community Rehabilitation Centers, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C47003, Community Rehabilitation Centers, plus up to $1,505,030. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, the Department of Youth Services shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbered amounts up to $232,539 from appropriation item C47003, Community Rehabilitation Centers, and $1,272,491 from appropriation item C47007, Local Juvenile Detention Centers. FACILITY CONSTRUCTION The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C47032, Facility Construction, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C47032, Facility Construction, plus the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C47022, Administrative and Education Building Expansions and Additions at Circleville Juvenile Correctional Facility, plus up to $308,430. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, the Department of Youth Services shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbered amounts up to $170,845 from appropriation item C47002, General Institutional Renovations, and $137,585 from appropriation item C47026, Indian River Program Building. Section 383.20. COMMUNITY REHABILITATION CENTERS For capital reappropriations in this act made from appropriation item C47003, Community Rehabilitation Centers, the Department of Youth Services shall designate the projects involving the construction and renovation of single-county and multicounty community corrections facilities. The Department of Youth Services may review and approve the renovation and construction of projects for which funds are provided. The proceeds of any obligations authorized under this section shall not be applied to any such facilities that are not designated and approved by the Department of Youth Services. The Department of Youth Services shall adopt guidelines to accept and review applications and designate projects. The guidelines shall require the county or counties to justify the need for the facility and to comply with timelines for the submission of documentation pertaining to the site, program, and construction. For purposes of this section, "community corrections facilities" has the same meaning as in section 5139.36 of the Revised Code. Section 383.30. LOCAL JUVENILE DETENTION CENTERS For capital reappropriations in this act made from appropriation item C47007, Local Juvenile Detention Centers, the Department of Youth Services shall designate the projects involving the construction and renovation of county and multicounty juvenile detention centers. The Department of Youth Services may review and approve the renovation and construction of projects for which funds are provided. The proceeds of any obligations authorized under this section shall not be applied to any such facilities that are not designated by the Department of Youth Services. The Department of Youth Services shall comply with the guidelines set forth in this section, accept and review applications, designate projects, and determine the amount of state match funding to be applied to each project. The department shall, with the advice of the county or counties participating in a project, determine the funded design capacity of the detention centers that are designated to receive funding. Notwithstanding any provisions to the contrary contained in Chapter 153. of the Revised Code, the Department of Youth Services may coordinate, review, and monitor the drawdown and use of funds for the renovation and construction of projects for which designated funds are provided. (A) The Department of Youth Services shall develop a formula to determine the amount, if any, of state match that may be provided to a single county or multicounty detention center project. (B) The formula developed by the Department of Youth Services shall yield a percentage of state match ranging from zero to sixty percent. The funding authorized under this section that may be applied to a construction or renovation project shall not exceed the actual cost of the project. The funding authorized under this section shall not be applied to any project unless the detention center will be built in compliance with health, safety, and security standards for detention centers as established by the Department of Youth Services. In addition, the funding authorized under this section shall not be applied to the renovation of a detention center unless the renovation is for the purpose of increasing the number of beds in the center, or to meet health, safety, or security standards for detention centers as established by the Department of Youth Services. Section 384.10. 1 2 3 A DEV DEPARTMENT OF DEVELOPMENT B Reappropriations C Service Station Cleanup Fund (Fund 7100) D C19507 Service Station Cleanup $2,000,000 E Service Station Cleanup Fund (Fund 7100) Total $2,000,000 F TOTAL ALL FUNDS $2,000,000 SERVICE STATION CLEANUP FUND (A) For purposes of this section: (1) "Political subdivision" means a county, municipal corporation, township, port authority, or a county land reutilization corporation organized under Chapter 1724. of the Revised Code. (2) "Class C release" has the same meaning as in section 3737.87 of the Revised Code. (3) "Property assessment" means a property assessment conducted in accordance with section 3746.04 of the Revised Code or a corrective action process or source investigation process under rule 1301:7-9-13 of the Ohio Administrative Code. (4) "Property owner" means a political subdivision, an organization that owns publicly owned lands, or, with respect to land forfeited to the state under Chapter 5723. of the Revised Code, a county land reutilization corporation. (5) "Cleanup or remediation" means any action at a Class C release site to contain, remove, or dispose of petroleum or other hazardous substances or remove underground storage tanks used to store petroleum or other hazardous substances. (6) "Publicly owned lands" includes lands that are owned by an organization that has entered into a relevant agreement with a political subdivision and lands forfeited to the state under Chapter 5723. of the Revised Code. (B) The Abandoned Gas Station Cleanup Grant Program is established in the Department of Development for the purpose of cleanup and remediation of Class C release sites to provide for and enable the environmentally safe and productive reuse of publicly owned lands by the remediation or cleanup, or planning and assessment for that remediation or cleanup, of contamination or by addressing property conditions or circumstances that may be deleterious to public health and safety or the environment or that preclude or inhibit environmentally sound or economic reuse of the property as authorized by Ohio Constitution, Article VIII, Section 2o. Under this program, the Director of Development may do either or both of the following: (1) Award a grant of up to $100,000 to a property owner for purposes of a property assessment on a Class C release site; (2) Award a grant of up to $500,000 to a property owner for purposes of cleanup or remediation of a Class C release site. Grants under divisions (B)(1) and (2) of this section shall be used by a property owner to create a site that provides opportunities for economic impact through redevelopment. The Director of Development may consult with the Environmental Protection Agency, the State Fire Marshal, the Ohio Water Development Authority, and the Ohio Public Works Commission in connection with this program and the awarding of these grants. (C) A property owner applying for a grant under division (B)(1) or (2) of this section shall submit an application for the grant on a form prescribed by the Director of Development. An authorized representative of the property owner shall sign and submit an affidavit with the application certifying that the property owner did not cause or contribute to any prior release of petroleum or other hazardous substances on the site. Upon receipt of an application, the Director shall examine the application and all accompanying information to determine if the application is complete. If the Director determines that the application is not complete, the Director shall promptly notify the property owner that the application is not complete, provide a description of the information that is missing from the application, and return the application and all accompanying information to the property owner. The property owner may resubmit the application. If the Director approves an application under this section, the Director may enter into an agreement with the property owner to award a grant to the property owner. The agreement shall be executed prior to paying or disbursing any grant funds approved by the Director under this section. With respect to a grant awarded to a county land reutilization corporation for land that has been forfeited to the state under Chapter 5723. of the Revised Code, the agreement shall require that the land be transferred to the corporation prior to the payment or disbursement of the grant funds. Section 385.10. 1 2 3 A EXP EXPOSITIONS COMMISSION B Reappropriations C Administrative Building Fund (Fund 7026) D C72305 Facility Improvement and Modernization Plan $8,998,260 E C72312 Emergency Renovations and Equipment Replacement $765,956 F Administrative Building Fund (Fund 7026) Total $9,764,216 G TOTAL ALL FUNDS $9,764,216 Section 387.10. 1 2 3 A FCC FACILITIES CONSTRUCTION COMMISSION B Reappropriations C Administrative Building Fund (Fund 7026) D C230E3 Hazardous Substance Abatement $246,840 E C230E5 State Agency Planning and Assessment $113,317 F Administrative Building Fund (Fund 7026) Total $360,157 G Cultural and Sports Facilities Building Fund (Fund 7030) H C23032 OHC - Ohio Historical Center Rehabilitation $5,000 I C23066 Variety Theater $85,000 J C230AB Cleveland Music Hall $400,000 K C230AE Variety Theatre $250,000 L C230AH Longtown Clemens Homestead $90,000 M C230BL Fairport Harbor Lighthouse Project $200,000 N C230BV Downtown Toledo Music Hall $400,000 O C230CH Mt. Perry Scenic Railroad Structure Renovations $125,000 P C230CM Waverly Old Children's Home Renovation $20,000 Q C230CN Garrettsville Buckeye Block Community Theater $227,323 R C230FM Cultural And Sports Facilities Projects $41,604,368 S C230FS OHC - Ohio River Museum $5,000 T C230GJ OHC - Hopewell Ceremonial Earthworks $11,650,000 U C230J6 West Side Market Renovation $500,000 V C230R8 National Ceramic Museum and Heritage Center Renovation $100,000 W C230X8 Riverside Veterans Memorial $15,000 X C230Y6 Ashtabula Maritime and Surface Transportation Museum $100,000 Y Cultural and Sports Facilities Building Fund (Fund 7030) Total $55,776,691 Z Public School Building Fund (Fund 7021) AA C23001 Public School Buildings $2,000,000 AB Public School Building Fund (Fund 7021) Total $2,000,000 AC School Building Program Assistance Fund (Fund 7032) AD C23002 School Building Program Assistance $380,000,000 AE School Building Program Assistance Fund (Fund 7032) Total $380,000,000 AF TOTAL ALL FUNDS $438,136,848 OHC - OHIO RIVER MUSEUM The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C230FS, OHC - Ohio River Museum, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C230FS, OHC - Ohio River Museum, plus the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C230W7, OHC - Lundy House Restoration. SCHOOL BUILDING PROGRAM ASSISTANCE The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C23002, School Building Program Assistance, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C23002, School Building Program Assistance, plus up to $9,294,558. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, the Ohio Facilities Construction Commission shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbered amounts up to $8,907,561 from appropriation item C23002, School Building Program Assistance, and $386,997 from appropriation item C23010, Vocational Facilities Assistance Program. STATE AGENCY PLANNING/ASSESSMENT The foregoing appropriation item C230E5, State Agency Planning/Assessment, shall be used by the Facilities Construction Commission to provide assistance to any state agency for assessment, capital planning, and maintenance management. Section 387.13. CULTURAL AND SPORTS FACILITIES PROJECTS The amount reappropriated from the foregoing appropriation item C230FM, Cultural and Sports Facilities Projects, shall be equal to the amount of all projects specified in this section, unless the amounts are released prior to June 30, 2026. The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C230FM, Cultural and Sports Facilities Projects, earmarked for Amherst Historical Society - Sandstone Quarry Museum, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C230BR, Amherst Historical Water Tower Project. The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C230FM, Cultural and Sports Facilities Projects, earmarked for Roy Rogers Esplanade Improvements, is the unencumbered balance as of the effective date of this amendment, in appropriation items C10058, Portsmouth MARCS. 1 2 A Project List B Dayton Dragons Improvements $2,000,000 C Columbus Symphony Orchestra $2,000,000 D Cincinnati Art Museum Improvements $1,650,000 E Louvee Theater $1,500,000 F Columbus Museum of Art Upgrades $1,250,000 G Jeep Museum $1,000,000 H Allen County Memorial Hall Improvements $1,000,000 I Playhouse Square $1,000,000 J Norwalk Theater Restoration $1,000,000 K Cleveland Museum of Art $1,000,000 L Greater Cleveland Foodbank $1,000,000 M Playhouse Square - Transformational Greyhound Project $1,000,000 N Severance Music Center $1,000,000 O Eric Mendelsohn Park Synagogue Campus Restoration $1,000,000 P Port Regal Theatre $1,000,000 Q Dayton Air Credit Union Ballpark $1,000,000 R Voice of America MetroPark & Museum Tylersville Road Grand Entrance $750,000 S Barn at Stratford Parking Lot Improvement and Expansion $657,000 T Central Presbyterian Church $650,000 U Mahoning Valley Historical Society Expansion and Improvement $600,000 V Dayton Art Institute Roof Replacement $600,000 W Ohio Aviation Hall of Fame $550,000 X Harroun Barn Restoration/Preservation $500,000 Y Cleveland Public Theatre Improvements $500,000 Z Historic Washington Auditorium Project $500,000 AA Miami Valley Veterans Museum $500,000 AB Canton Township Palace Theater $500,000 AC Great Lakes Science Center - Water Technology Exhibition $500,000 AD Karamu House Capstone Capital Improvements $500,000 AE Museum of Contemporary Art Improvements $500,000 AF Central Presbyterian Church Renovation (CAPA) $500,000 AG Mansfield Theater Road to 100 Renovation $500,000 AH Day Air Credit Union Ballpark Professional Development License Facility Standard Improvements $500,000 AI International Soap Box Derby $500,000 AJ Columbus Museum of Art $350,000 AK Federal Valley Resource Center $350,000 AL Fort Laurens Restoration $330,000 AM Children's Museum of Cleveland $307,500 AN Rockwell District Cultural and Arts Amphitheater - Whitehall $300,000 AO Renovation of Wellman Theater $300,000 AP Champaign County YMCA $300,000 AQ Willoughby Amphitheater $300,000 AR BAYarts Cultural Arts Center Expansion $288,000 AS Oak Harbor Riverfront $275,000 AT Piqua Arts - The Bank $250,000 AU Yoctangee Park Historic Armory $250,000 AV Canton Memorial Civic Center Improvements $250,000 AW Beck Center for the Arts $250,000 AX Northside's Outdoor Community Entertainment Venue $250,000 AY Performing Arts Stage $200,000 AZ Central Ohio Fire Museum Restoration $200,000 BA Cincinnati Regal Theater Renovation $200,000 BB Hollywood Theatre $200,000 BC East Liverpool Revitalization Project $200,000 BD Butler Institute of Art Studio Maker Space $200,000 BE Complete Cozad - Health Hospitality Campus $200,000 BF South Webster Historic City Hall Events Center & Museum $200,000 BG Canton Palace Theatre $200,000 BH Roy Rogers Esplanade Improvements $200,000 BI St. Clairsville Train Depot $150,000 BJ Johnstown Amphitheater $150,000 BK Powell Education Center $150,000 BL Richwood Pavilion $150,000 BM Clearview Museum $150,000 BN Van Wert Area Performing Arts $150,000 BO Morgan County Historical Society $144,000 BP John and Iris Hathaway Education and Community Center $125,000 BQ Lorain County Historical Society $112,000 BR Outdoor Restroom Facility Construction $100,000 BS Wellston Sport Complex $100,000 BT Cleveland Majestic Hall $100,000 BU El Mercado at La Villa Hispana Cultural Revitalization $100,000 BV Old Town Hall $100,000 BW Dublin Arts Council - Muirfield Drive Project $100,000 BX Swanton Memorial Park Improvements $100,000 BY Covedale Center - Phase 6 Renovations $100,000 BZ West Liberty Town Hall Opera House Community Center Restoration and Renovation $100,000 CA Gant Stadium Renovation $100,000 CB Jacob Miller Tavern $100,000 CC Jacob Miller's Tavern Renovation $100,000 CD Circleville Historic City Hall Improvements $100,000 CE Middletown Entertainment and Sports Venue $100,000 CF Firelands Historical Society Expansion $100,000 CG Collingwood Arts Center Upgrades $100,000 CH Battle of Buffington Island Civil War Battlefield Museum $100,000 CI Camden Opera House Second Floor Renovation $100,000 CJ Swiss Community Historical Society - Heritage Center $100,000 CK The Music Settlement Center for Innovation, Education, and Technology $100,000 CL Polish Cultural Center $100,000 CM Historic Hoover Auditorium Renovation $100,000 CN Hotel McArthur $100,000 CO Rome Township Community Park $100,000 CP Waterloo Arts Renovation Project $100,000 CQ National Veterans Memorial and Museum Core Improvements $100,000 CR Cincinnati Observatory Improvements $100,000 CS Galion Big Four Depot Renovation $100,000 CT Start Westward Memorial $100,000 CU The Funk Music Hall of Fame and Exhibition Center $100,000 CV Twin City Opera House $100,000 CW Portage Riverwalk Arts Infrastructure - Oak Harbor $100,000 CX Barker House Stabilization Project $100,000 CY The Mark at the Park Sponsors VIP Pavilion $95,000 CZ Muirfield/Dublin Arts Project $75,000 DA Tarlton Community Building $75,000 DB Pleasant Square Community Center $75,000 DC Hune Covered Bridge Relocation $75,000 DD Heritage House Museum Restoration $75,000 DE Massillon Museum Improvements $75,000 DF Grant Presidential Sculpture $50,000 DG Clark Gable Facility Improvements $50,000 DH Wright Patterson Air Force Base Holocaust Museum $50,000 DI John S. Knight Convention Center $50,000 DJ Trumpet in the Land Outdoor Drama Tower Project $50,000 DK Decorative Arts Center of Ohio Accessibility Project $50,000 DL Grand Army of the Republic Hall $50,000 DM Canton Museum of Art $50,000 DN G.A.R. Hall Historic Rehabilitation $50,000 DO York Township Historical Society Museum and Educational Center $45,000 DP Miami Valley Veterans Museum Upgrades $45,000 DQ West Liberty Piatt Castle Mac-A-Cheek Improvements $44,000 DR Amherst Historical Society - Sandstone Quarry Museum $40,000 DS Wendel Concert Stage $35,000 DT History of Weston, Historical Offerings $30,000 DU Village of Garrettsville Cemetery $25,000 DV Bucyrus Bicentennial Arch Project $25,000 DW Piketon Liberty Memorial $25,000 DX Dayton Contemporary Dance Arts and Cultural Center $25,000 DY Shelby House Museum $20,000 DZ Historic 19th Century Jefferson Depot Village $20,000 EA Muskingum County History (FKA Stone Academy) $15,668 EB Louisville Mainstreet $15,000 EC Paulding County Historical Electrical Wiring Project $14,500 ED Jackson Center Museum Building Improvements $13,500 EE Palmyra Township Historical Society $12,700 EF Jewish Community of Canton Technology Upgrades $10,000 EG Leipsic Recreation Center Improvements $7,500 EH Jeromesville Totem Pole $3,000 Section 387.15. HAZARDOUS SUBSTANCE ABATEMENT IN STATE FACILITIES The foregoing appropriation item C230E3, Hazardous Substance Abatement, shall be used to fund the removal of asbestos, PCB, radon gas, and other contamination hazards from state facilities. Prior to the release of funds for asbestos abatement, the Ohio Facilities Construction Commission shall review proposals from state agencies to use these funds for asbestos abatement projects based on criteria developed by the Ohio Facilities Construction Commission. Upon a determination by the Ohio Facilities Construction Commission that the requesting agency cannot fund the asbestos abatement project or other toxic materials removal through existing capital and operating appropriations, the Commission may request the release of funds for such projects by the Controlling Board. State agencies intending to fund asbestos abatement or other toxic materials removal through existing capital and operating appropriations shall notify the Executive Director of the Ohio Facilities Construction Commission of the nature and scope prior to commencing the project. Only agencies that have received appropriations for capital projects from the Administrative Building Fund (Fund 7026) are eligible to receive funding from this item. Public school districts are not eligible. Section 387.20. SCHOOL BUILDING PROGRAM ASSISTANCE The foregoing appropriation item C23002, School Building Program Assistance, shall be used by the Facilities Construction Commission to provide funding to school districts that receive conditional approval from the Commission pursuant to Chapter 3318. of the Revised Code. Section 391.10. 1 2 3 A JSC JUDICIARY SUPREME COURT B Reappropriations C Administrative Building Fund (Fund 7026) D C00502 General Building Renovations $5,000 E Administrative Building Fund (Fund 7026) Total $5,000 F TOTAL ALL FUNDS $5,000 GENERAL BUILDING RENOVATIONS The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C00502, General Building Renovations, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C00502, General Building Renovations, plus up to $186,522. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, The Supreme Court shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbered amounts up to $186,522 from appropriation item C00502, General Building Renovations. Section 393.10. 1 2 3 A PWC PUBLIC WORKS COMMISSION B Reappropriations C Clean Ohio Conservation Fund (Fund 7056) D C15060 Clean Ohio Conservation $7,990 E C150AA Clean Ohio - District 1 $1,500,000 F C150BB Clean Ohio - District 2 $3,250,000 G C150CC Clean Ohio - District 3 $8,000,000 H C150DD Clean Ohio - District 4 $3,000,000 I C150EE Clean Ohio - District 5 $3,250,000 J C150FF Clean Ohio - District 6 $4,100,000 K C150GG Clean Ohio - District 7 $2,400,000 L C150HH Clean Ohio - District 8 $2,940,162 M C150II Clean Ohio - District 9 $2,500,000 N C150JJ Clean Ohio - District 10 $4,850,000 O C150KK Clean Ohio - District 11 $4,000,000 P C150LL Clean Ohio - District 12 $2,750,000 Q C150MM Clean Ohio - District 13 $5,000,000 R C150NN Clean Ohio - District 14 $3,450,000 S C150OO Clean Ohio - District 15 $3,000,000 T C150PP Clean Ohio - District 16 $2,500,000 U C150QQ Clean Ohio - District 17 $2,900,000 V C150RR Clean Ohio - District 18 $3,500,000 W C150SS Clean Ohio - District 19 $4,400,000 X Clean Ohio Conservation Fund (Fund 7056) Total $67,298,152 Y State Capital Improvements Fund (Fund 7038) Z C15000 Local Public Infrastructure $1,004,000 AA C15001 Infrastructure - District 1 $35,000,000 AB C15002 Infrastructure - District 2 $19,000,000 AC C15003 Infrastructure - District 3 $35,000,000 AD C15004 Infrastructure - District 4 $7,000,000 AE C15005 Infrastructure - District 5 $4,500,000 AF C15006 Infrastructure - District 6 $5,000,000 AG C15007 Infrastructure - District 7 $5,000,000 AH C15008 Infrastructure - District 8 $11,000,000 AI C15009 Infrastructure - District 9 $7,000,000 AJ C15010 Infrastructure - District 10 $15,000,000 AK C15011 Infrastructure - District 11 $11,500,000 AL C15012 Infrastructure - District 12 $5,000,000 AM C15013 Infrastructure - District 13 $4,000,000 AN C15014 Infrastructure - District 14 $4,000,000 AO C15015 Infrastructure - District 15 $5,000,000 AP C15016 Infrastructure - District 16 $6,000,000 AQ C15017 Infrastructure - District 17 $5,500,000 AR C15018 Infrastructure - District 18 $3,500,000 AS C15019 Infrastructure - District 19 $5,000,000 AT C15020 Emergency Set Aside $30,000,000 AU C15022 Ohio Small Government Capital Improvement $29,000,000 AV State Capital Improvements Fund (Fund 7038) Total $253,004,000 AW State Capital Improvements Revolving Loan Fund (Fund 7040) AX C150RA Revolving Loan - District 1 $15,000,000 AY C150RB Revolving Loan - District 2 $5,500,000 AZ C150RC Revolving Loan - District 3 $14,000,000 BA C150RD Revolving Loan - District 4 $5,000,000 BB C150RE Revolving Loan - District 5 $3,300,000 BC C150RF Revolving Loan - District 6 $6,500,000 BD C150RG Revolving Loan - District 7 $5,000,000 BE C150RH Revolving Loan - District 8 $4,750,000 BF C150RI Revolving Loan - District 9 $4,500,000 BG C150RJ Revolving Loan - District 10 $5,000,000 BH C150RK Revolving Loan - District 11 $45,000,000 BI C150RL Revolving Loan - District 12 $5,900,000 BJ C150RM Revolving Loan - District 13 $2,000,000 BK C150RN Revolving Loan - District 14 $5,000,000 BL C150RO Revolving Loan - District 15 $3,500,000 BM C150RP Revolving Loan - District 16 $4,000,000 BN C150RQ Revolving Loan - District 17 $4,500,000 BO C150RS Revolving Loan - District 18 $2,000,000 BP C150RT Revolving Loan - District 19 $2,600,000 BQ C150RU Small Government Program $4,000,000 BR C150RV Emergency Program $6,200,000 BS State Capital Improvements Revolving Loan Fund (Fund 7040) Total $153,250,000 BT TOTAL ALL FUNDS $473,552,152 LOCAL PUBLIC INFRASTRUCTURE Capital reappropriations in this act made from the State Capital Improvements Fund (Fund 7038) shall be used in accordance with sections 164.01 to 164.12 of the Revised Code. The Director of the Public Works Commission may certify to the Director of Budget and Management that a need exists to appropriate investment earnings to be used in accordance with sections 164.01 to 164.12 of the Revised Code. If the Director of Budget and Management determines pursuant to division (D) of section 164.08 and section 164.12 of the Revised Code that investment earnings are available to support additional appropriations, such amounts are hereby appropriated. If the Public Works Commission receives refunds due to project overpayments that are discovered during a post-project audit, the Director of the Public Works Commission may certify to the Director of Budget and Management that refunds have been received. In certifying the refunds, the Director of the Public Works Commission shall provide the Director of Budget and Management information on the project refunds. The certification shall detail by project the source and amount of project overpayments received and include any supporting documentation required or requested by the Director of Budget and Management. Upon receipt of the certification, the Director of Budget and Management shall determine if the project refunds are necessary to support existing appropriations. If the project refunds are available to support additional appropriations, these amounts are hereby appropriated to appropriation item C15000, Local Public Infrastructure/State CIP. REVOLVING LOAN Capital reappropriations in this act made from the State Capital Improvements Revolving Loan Fund (Fund 7040) shall be used in accordance with sections 164.01 to 164.12 of the Revised Code. If the Public Works Commission receives refunds due to project overpayments that are discovered during a post-project audit, the Director of the Public Works Commission may certify to the Director of Budget and Management that refunds have been received. In certifying the refunds, the Director of the Public Works Commission shall provide the Director of Budget and Management information on the project refunds. The certification shall detail by project the source and amount of project overpayments received and include any supporting documentation required or requested by the Director of Budget and Management. Upon receipt of the certification, the Director of Budget and Management shall determine if the project refunds are necessary to support existing appropriations. If the project refunds are available to support additional appropriations, these amounts are hereby appropriated to appropriation item C15030, Revolving Loan. CLEAN OHIO CONSERVATION GRANT REPAYMENTS Capital reappropriations in this act made from the Clean Ohio Conservation Fund (Fund 7056) shall be used in accordance with sections 164.20 to 164.27 of the Revised Code. Any amount in grant repayments received by the Public Works Commission and deposited into the Clean Ohio Conservation Fund pursuant to section 164.261 of the Revised Code is hereby appropriated through the foregoing appropriation item C15060, Clean Ohio Conservation. Section 395.10. 1 2 3 A OSB DEAF AND BLIND EDUCATION SERVICES B Reappropriations C Administrative Building Fund (Fund 7026) D C22616 Renovations and Improvements $880,000 E C22624 Natatorium Renovations $757,620 F C22631 Campus Connector $2,112,248 G Administrative Building Fund (Fund 7026) Total $3,749,868 H TOTAL ALL FUNDS $3,749,868 RENOVATIONS AND IMPROVEMENTS The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C22616, Renovations and Improvements, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C22616, Renovations and Improvements, plus up to $292,345. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, the Deaf and Blind Education Services shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbered amounts up to $103,979 from appropriation item C22107, Renovations and Improvements, and $188,366 from appropriation item C22114, Dormitory Construction. Section 509.01. CERTIFICATION OF AVAILABILITY OF MONEYS Moneys that require release shall not be expended from any appropriation contained in this act without certification of the Director of Budget and Management that there are sufficient moneys in the state treasury in the fund from which the appropriation is made. Such certification made by the Office of Budget and Management shall be based on estimates of revenue, receipts, and expenses. Nothing in this section limits the authority of the Director of Budget and Management granted in section 126.07 of the Revised Code. Section 509.02. LIMITATION ON USE OF CAPITAL APPROPRIATIONS The appropriations made in this act, excluding those made from the State Capital Improvement Fund (Fund 7038) and the State Capital Improvements Revolving Loan Fund (Fund 7040) for buildings or structures, including remodeling and renovations, are limited to: (A) Acquisition of real property or interests in real property; (B) Buildings and structures, which includes construction, demolition, complete heating and cooling, lighting, and lighting fixtures, and all necessary utilities, ventilating, plumbing, sprinkling, water and sewer systems, when such systems are authorized or necessary; (C) Architectural, engineering, and professional services expenses directly related to the projects; (D) Machinery that is necessary to the operation or function of the building or structure at the time of initial acquisition or construction; (E) Acquisition, development, and deployment of new computer systems, including the integration of existing and new computer systems, but excluding regular or ongoing maintenance or support agreements; (F) Furniture, fixtures, or equipment that meets all the following criteria: (1) Is essential in bringing the facility up to its intended use or is necessary for the functioning of the particular facility or project; (2) Has a unit cost of about $100 or more; and (3) Has a useful life of five years or more. Furniture, fixtures, or equipment that is not an integral part of or directly related to the basic purpose or function of a project for which moneys are appropriated shall not be paid for from these appropriations. This paragraph does not apply to appropriation items specifically for furniture, fixtures, or equipment. Section 509.03. CONTINGENCY RESERVE REQUIREMENT Any request for release of capital appropriations by the Director of Budget and Management or the Controlling Board for projects, the contracts for which are awarded by the Ohio Facilities Construction Commission, shall contain a contingency reserve, the amount of which shall be determined by the Ohio Facilities Construction Commission, for payment of unanticipated project expenses. Any amount deducted from the encumbrance for a contractor's contract as an assessment for liquidated damages shall be added to the encumbrance for the contingency reserve. Contingency reserve funds shall be used to pay costs resulting from unanticipated job conditions, to comply with rulings regarding building and other codes, to pay costs related to errors or omissions in contract documents, to pay costs associated with changes in the scope of work, and to pay the cost of settlements and judgments related to the project. Any funds remaining upon completion of a project, may, upon approval of the Controlling Board, be released for the use of the institution to which the appropriation was made for another capital facilities project or projects. Section 509.04. SATISFACTION OF JUDGMENTS AND SETTLEMENTS AGAINST THE STATE Except as otherwise provided in this section, an appropriation contained in this act or in any other act may be used for the purpose of satisfying judgments, settlements, or administrative awards ordered or approved by the Court of Claims or by any other court of competent jurisdiction in connection with civil actions against the state. This authorization does not apply to appropriations that are to be applied to or used for payment of guarantees by or on behalf of the state or for payments under lease agreements relating to or debt service on bonds, notes, or other obligations of the state. Notwithstanding any other section of law to the contrary, this authorization includes appropriations from funds into which proceeds or direct obligations of the state are deposited only to the extent that the judgment, settlement, or administrative award is for or represents capital costs for which the appropriation may otherwise be used and is consistent with the purpose for which any related obligations were issued or entered into. Nothing contained in this section is intended to subject the state to suit in any forum in which it is not otherwise subject to suit, nor is it intended to waive or compromise any defense or right available to the state in any suit against it. Section 509.05. CAPITAL RELEASES BY THE DIRECTOR OF BUDGET AND MANAGEMENT Notwithstanding section 126.14 of the Revised Code, appropriations for appropriation items C50100, Local Jails, and C50101, Community-Based Correctional Facilities, appropriated from the Adult Correctional Building Fund (Fund 7027) to the Department of Rehabilitation and Correction, and any projects specifically identified for appropriation item C58050, Community Support, shall be released upon the written approval of the Director of Budget and Management. The appropriations from the Public School Building Fund (Fund 7021) and the School Building Program Assistance Fund (Fund 7032) to the Facilities Construction Commission, from the Transportation Building Fund (Fund 7029) to the Department of Transportation, from the Clean Ohio Conservation Fund (Fund 7056), the State Capital Improvement Fund (Fund 7038), and the State Capital Improvements Revolving Loan Fund (Fund 7040) to the Public Works Commission, and from the Underground Parking Garage Operating Fund (Fund 2080) to the Capitol Square Review and Advisory Board shall be released upon presentation of a request to release the funds, by the agency to which the appropriation has been made, to the Director of Budget and Management. Section 509.06. PREVAILING WAGE REQUIREMENT Except as provided in section 4115.04 of the Revised Code, moneys appropriated or reappropriated by the 136th General Assembly shall not be used for the construction of public improvements, as defined in section 4115.03 of the Revised Code, unless the mechanics, laborers, or workers engaged therein are paid the prevailing rate of wages prescribed in section 4115.04 of the Revised Code. Nothing in this section affects the wages and salaries established for state employees under Chapter 124. of the Revised Code, or collective bargaining agreements entered into by the state under Chapter 4117. of the Revised Code, while engaged on force account work, nor does this section interfere with the use of inmate and patient labor by the state. Section 509.07. AUTHORIZATION OF THE DIRECTOR OF BUDGET AND MANAGEMENT The Director of Budget and Management shall authorize both of the following: (A) The initial release of moneys for projects from the funds into which proceeds of direct obligations of the state are deposited; and (B) The expenditure or encumbrance of moneys from funds into which proceeds of direct obligations are deposited, only after determining to the Director's satisfaction that either of the following applies: (1) The application of such moneys to the particular project will not negatively affect any exclusion of the interest or interest equivalent on obligations issued to provide moneys to the particular fund from the calculation of gross income for federal income tax purposes under the "Internal Revenue Code of 1986," 100 Stat. 2085, 26 U.S.C. 1, as amended. (2) Moneys for the project will come from the proceeds of federally taxable obligations, the interest on which is not so excluded from the calculation of gross income for federal income tax purposes and which have been authorized and issued on that basis by their issuing authority. In the event the Director determines that the condition set forth in division (B)(1) of this section does not apply, and that there is no existing fund in the state treasury to enable compliance with the condition set forth in division (B)(2) of this section, the Director may create a fund in the state treasury for the purpose of receiving proceeds of federally taxable obligations. The Director may establish capital appropriation items in that taxable bond fund that correspond to the preexisting capital appropriation items in the associated tax-exempt bond fund. The Director also may transfer capital appropriations in whole or in part between the taxable and tax-exempt bond funds within a particular purpose for which the bonds have been authorized. Section 509.08. ACCOUNTING MAINTENANCE BY THE DIRECTOR OF BUDGET AND MANAGEMENT Within the limits set forth in this act, the Director of Budget and Management shall establish accounts indicating the source and amount of funds for each appropriation made in this act, and shall determine the form and manner in which appropriation accounts shall be maintained in accordance with section 126.21 of the Revised Code. Section 509.11. REQUIREMENTS RELATING TO NON-STATE OWNERSHIP OF CERTAIN FINANCED PROJECTS (A) No capital improvement appropriations or reappropriations made in this act shall be released for planning or for improvement, renovation, or construction or acquisition of capital facilities if a state agency, as defined in section 154.01 of the Revised Code, does not own the real property that constitutes the capital facilities or on which the capital facilities are or will be located unless provided for elsewhere in this act. This restriction does not apply in any of the following circumstances: (1) The state agency has a long-term (at least as long as the obligations that financed the project) lease of, or other interest (such as an easement) in, the real property. (2) In the case of an appropriation or reappropriation for capital facilities that, because of their unique nature or location, will be owned or be part of facilities owned by a separate nonprofit organization and made available to the state agency for its use or benefit, the nonprofit organization either owns or has a long-term (at least as long as the obligations that financed the project) lease of the real property or other capital facility to be improved, renovated, constructed, or acquired and has entered into a joint or cooperative use agreement, with and approved by the state agency that meets the requirements of division (B) of this section. (B) In the case of capital facilities referred to in division (A)(2) of this section, the joint or cooperative use agreement shall include, as a minimum, provisions that: (1) Specify the extent and nature of that joint or cooperative use, extending for not shorter than the length of the obligations that financed the project, with the value of such use or right to use to be, as determined by the parties and approved by the approving department, reasonably related to the amount of the appropriation; (2) Provide for pro rata reimbursement to the state should the arrangement for joint or cooperative use by a state agency be terminated; and (3) Provide that procedures to be followed during the capital improvement process will comply with appropriate applicable state statutes and rules, including the provisions of this act. (C) This section does not apply to appropriations or reappropriations from the State Capital Improvements Fund (Fund 7038), State Capital Improvements Revolving Loan Fund (Fund 7040), Clean Ohio Conservation Fund (Fund 7056), Clean Ohio Revitalization Fund (Fund 7003), the Service Station Cleanup Fund (Fund 7100), or the School Building Program Assistance Fund (Fund 7032). Section 509.12. REAPPROPRIATION OF UNEXPENDED ENCUMBERED BALANCES OF CAPITAL APPROPRIATIONS (A)(1) Notwithstanding the original year of appropriation or encumbrance, the unexpended balance of a capital appropriation or reappropriation that a state agency has lawfully encumbered prior to the close of the fiscal year 2025-2026 capital biennium is hereby reappropriated for the fiscal year 2027-2028 capital biennium from the fund from which it was originally appropriated or was reappropriated and shall be used only for the purpose of discharging the encumbrance. For those encumbered appropriations or reappropriations, any Controlling Board approval previously granted and referenced by the encumbering document remains in effect until the encumbrance is discharged or until the encumbrance expires at the end of the fiscal year 2027-2028 capital biennium. (2) During the fiscal year 2027-2028 capital biennium, the Director of Budget and Management may cancel an encumbrance that was reappropriated pursuant to division (A)(1) of this section if the Director determines that the encumbrance is no longer needed to complete the project for which it was reappropriated or appropriated. (B) If during the fiscal year 2027-2028 capital biennium, pursuant to section 126.22 of the Revised Code in order to correct an accounting error, the Director of Budget and Management reestablishes an encumbrance that was reappropriated pursuant to division (A) of this section, the amount representing the encumbrance canceled in error is reappropriated in accordance with division (A) of this section. Section 509.13. PREVIOUSLY RELEASED REAPPROPRIATIONS Capital reappropriations in this act that have been released by the Controlling Board or the Director of Budget and Management between July 1, 2024, and June 30, 2026, do not require further approval or release prior to being encumbered. Funds reappropriated in excess of such prior releases shall be released in accordance with applicable provisions of this act. Section 509.14. REAPPROPRIATION OF UNENCUMBERED BALANCES OF CAPITAL APPROPRIATIONS The reappropriations made in this act represent the unencumbered balances of prior years' capital improvements appropriations estimated to be available on June 30, 2026. Notwithstanding the foregoing, unless otherwise specified, the actual unencumbered balances on June 30, 2026, for the appropriation items in this act identified as reappropriations are hereby reappropriated. Additionally, there is hereby reappropriated the actual unencumbered balances on June 30, 2026, of any appropriation items either appropriated or reappropriated in H.B. 2 of the 135th General Assembly or appropriated in S.B. 54 of the 135th General Assembly, H.B. 434 of the 136th General Assembly, H.B. 184 of the 136th General Assembly, or H.B. 96 of the 136th General Assembly, and not otherwise listed in this act, or created by the Controlling Board pursuant to section 127.15 of the Revised Code, if the Director of Budget and Management determines that such balances are needed to complete the projects for which they were reappropriated or appropriated. The appropriation items and amounts that are reappropriated by this act shall be reported to the Controlling Board within 30 days after the effective date of this section. Section 518.10. OBLIGATIONS ISSUED UNDER CHAPTER 151. OF THE REVISED CODE The capital improvements for which appropriations or reappropriations are made in this act from the Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024), the Ohio Parks and Natural Resources Fund (Fund 7031), the School Building Program Assistance Fund (Fund 7032), the Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034), the State Capital Improvements Fund (Fund 7038), the State Capital Improvements Revolving Loan Fund (Fund 7040), the Coal Research and Development Fund (Fund 7046), the Clean Ohio Conservation Fund (Fund 7056), the Clean Ohio Agricultural Easement Fund (Fund 7057), and the Clean Ohio Trail Fund (Fund 7061) are determined to be capital improvements and capital facilities for natural resources, a statewide system of common schools, state-supported and state-assisted institutions of higher education, local subdivision capital improvement projects, coal research and development projects, and conservation purposes (under the Clean Ohio Program) and are designated as capital facilities to which proceeds of obligations issued under Chapter 151. of the Revised Code are to be applied. Section 518.20. OBLIGATIONS ISSUED UNDER CHAPTER 154. OF THE REVISED CODE The capital improvements for which appropriations or reappropriations are made in this act from the Administrative Building Taxable Bond Fund (Fund 7016), the Administrative Building Fund (Fund 7026), the Adult Correctional Building Fund (Fund 7027), the Juvenile Correctional Building Fund (Fund 7028), the Transportation Building Fund (Fund 7029), the Cultural and Sports Facilities Building Fund (Fund 7030), the Mental Health Facilities Improvement Fund (Fund 7033), and the Parks and Recreation Improvement Fund (Fund 7035) are determined to be capital improvements and capital facilities for housing state agencies and branches of government, mental health and developmental disabilities, and parks and recreation and are designated as capital facilities to which proceeds of obligations issued under Chapter 154. of the Revised Code are to be applied. Section 523.10. TRANSFER OF OPEN ENCUMBRANCES Upon the request of the agency to which a capital project appropriation item is appropriated, the Director of Budget and Management may transfer open encumbrance amounts between separate encumbrances for the project appropriation item to the extent that any reductions in encumbrances are agreed to by the contracting vendor and the agency. Section 525.10. LITIGATION PROCEEDS TO THE ADMINISTRATIVE BUILDING FUND Except as otherwise required by section 109.112 of the Revised Code, any proceeds received by the state as the result of litigation or a settlement agreement related to any liability for the planning, design, engineering, construction, or constructed management of facilities operated by the Department of Administrative Services shall be deposited into the General Revenue Fund or the Building Improvement Fund (Fund 5KZ0). Section 527.10. TRANSFERS FROM THE CLEAN OHIO REVITALIZATION FUND TO THE SERVICE STATION CLEANUP FUND During the biennium ending June 30, 2028, the Director of Budget and Management, at the request of the Director of Development, may transfer up to the remaining unobligated cash balance from the Clean Ohio Revitalization Fund (Fund 7003) to the Service Station Cleanup Fund (Fund 7100) as needed to provide for Service Station Cleanup grants awarded by the Director of Development. Section 529.10. REDUCTION OF DEBT AUTHORIZATION Amounts issuing authorities have been previously authorized to issue and sell in accordance with Article VIII of the Ohio Constitution shall be reduced by the total amounts transferred into their corresponding funds from the General Revenue Fund under Section 529.10 of H.B. 687 of the 134th General Assembly. Section 605.10. That Section 200.30 of H.B. 2 of the 135th General Assembly (as amended by H.B. 184 of the 136th General Assembly) be amended to read as follows: Sec. 200.30. ONE TIME STRATEGIC COMMUNITY INVESTMENTS On June 28, 2024, or as soon as possible thereafter, the Director of Budget and Management shall transfer $17,800,000 cash from the General Revenue Fund to the One Time Strategic Community Investments Fund (Fund 5AY1). The foregoing appropriation item 042509, One Time Strategic Community Investments, shall be used by the Office of Budget and Management to provide grants for the projects listed in this section in the amounts listed. Prior to disbursing a grant to a recipient, the Office of Budget and Management shall enter into a grant agreement with the recipient. As part of the grant agreement, the recipient shall agree to complete a final report, in a form and manner to be prescribed by the Office of Budget and Management, detailing how the recipient used the grant and submit the report to the Office of Budget and Management. An amount equal to the unexpended, unencumbered balance of the foregoing appropriation item 042509, One Time Strategic Community Investments, at the end of fiscal year 2025 is hereby reappropriated for the same purpose in fiscal year 2026. 1 2 A Project Amount B Adams County Fairgrounds Improvements $400,000 C Adams County Welcome Center $350,000 D Adams County Community Foundation $200,000 E West Union Wastewater Plant Improvements $200,000 F Lima Veterans Memorial Hall Improvements $10,000,000 G Allen County Airport Fuel Farm $1,000,000 H Rhodes State Advanced Manufacturing Equipment and Lab $440,000 I Allen County Child Support Enforcement Agency Facility $375,000 J Heir Force Community School Land Acquisition $250,000 K Temple Christian School Building Expansion $250,000 L Boys and Girls Club of Lima $100,000 M Ashland County Fair $1,100,000 N Cinnamon Lake Sewer District Lift Station $1,000,000 O Charles Mill Marina Houseboat and Path Renovation $910,000 P Hugo Young Theatre $248,554 Q Davy McClure Outdoor Education Shelter $200,000 R Ashland County Fire Training Facility $200,000 S Hickory Street Sanitary Sewer Lift Station $76,000 T Rowsburg Community Center $30,000 U Hayesville Pedestrian Walkway $25,000 V SPIRE Institute $1,000,000 W Ashtabula Juvenile Court Improvements $800,000 X Boys and Girls Club of Ashtabula $132,274 Y Country Neighbor Program $101,600 Z VFW Roof Repairs Geneva Post 6846 $99,037 AA Ashtabula Arts Center Restroom Project $45,000 AB Athens Regional Training Center $2,500,000 AC The Appalachian Center for Economic Networks Food Sector Accelerator Project $700,000 AD Nelsonville-York Elementary School (NYES) Playground Renovation $250,000 AE York Township VFD Project $250,000 AF City of Nelsonville Dog Park $139,731 AG Boys and Girls Club of Athens $100,000 AH Buchtel Village Park Project $100,000 AI Edna Brooks Domestic Violence Shelter $36,800 AJ Village of Waynesfield Veteran’s Park Enhancement $352,950 AK Saint Mary's Reservoir Mill $250,000 AL New Bremen Public Library Renovation $200,000 AM YMCA Auglaize-Mercer Recreation Complex $200,000 AN Barton VFD Station $1,000,000 AO Belmont Volunteer Fire Department New Station $1,000,000 AP The Sargus Center Revitalization and Sustainability Initiative $500,000 AQ Mead Township Hall and Garage Project $300,000 AR VFW Roof Repairs Powhatan Point Post 5565 $24,900 AS Future Plans Sanctuary $3,000,000 AT Brown County Junior Fair Covered Horse Arena $400,000 AU Water Infrastructure Bramel Mobile Home Park $400,000 AV Millikin Interchange Improvements $8,500,000 AW Madison Township Firehouse Improvements $1,750,000 AX BCRTA Outdoor Workforce Training $1,000,000 AY Riversedge Amphitheater Expansion $1,000,000 AZ Shuler Benninghofen Mixed-Use Project $1,000,000 BA VOA MetroPark Museum Grand Entrance $1,000,000 BB Oxford Student Safety Project $800,000 BC Liberty Playground Replacement Project $500,000 BD Madison Township Park Revitalization $500,000 BE Welding Lab Program Expansion in Fairfield Township $450,000 BF Monroe Plaza South Project $400,000 BG Hamilton YWCA Domestic Violence ProjectHamilton Scholar House $400,000 BH World Class Clubs: Repairing Community Gymnasium $225,000 BI Boys and Girls Club of West Chester/Liberty $218,796 BJ VFW Roof Repairs West Chester Post 7696 $15,560 BK Carroll County Annex Building Rehab $500,000 BL Seven Ranges Scout Reservation Facility Upgrades $500,000 BM Dellroy Village Storm Drain and Street Repair $250,000 BN Carroll County Agricultural Service Center $200,000 BO Minerva Downtown Revitalization Project $200,000 BP Dellroy Village Offices/Garage Renovations $195,250 BQ Champaign Aviation Museum Improvements $20,000 BR Champion City Sports and Wellness Center $4,000,000 BS A.B. Graham MemorialChampion City Sports and Wellness Center $750,000 BT Champion Center Arena Improvements $250,000 BU Goshen Fire Department Station 18 Rebuild $2,500,000 BV Felicity Veterans Village Housing Project $1,000,000 BW Milford Five Points Landing $400,000 BX Union Township Community Splash Pad $268,125 BY Nisbet Park Amphitheater $250,000 BZ Moscow Ohio River Stabilization, Phase III $240,000 CA Williamsburg Township Emergency Services Upgrades $150,000 CB Owensville Historical Society Museum $132,000 CC Williamsburg Community Park Trail Extension $86,770 CD VFW Roof Repairs Loveland Post 5354 $28,505 CE VFW Roof Repairs New Richmond Post 6770 $20,894 CF Boys and Girls Club of Clermont $18,921 CG Wilmington Runway Reopening and Improvements $3,500,000 CH Doan-Walnut-Short Street Water Main $500,000 CI Columbiana County Annex/Drug Task Force Building $2,900,000 CJ Utica Shale Academy Improvements $2,500,000 CK East Palestine Village Safety Complex $1,000,000 CL Hanover Township Fire and Emergency Medical Services Expansion Initiative $250,000 CM Lepper Restoration Project $175,000 CN City of Coshocton Fire Training Tower $1,000,000 CO Coshocton Skip’s Landing and Downtown Revitalization $750,000 CP City of Coshocton Roscoe Cemetery Improvements $460,000 CQ City of Coshocton Pickleball Court Upgrades $300,000 CR City of Coshocton Water Plant Electrical Upgrades $300,000 CS City of Coshocton Town Hall Roof Project $240,000 CT City of Coshocton Emergency Generator Project $200,000 CU Coshocton County Library Masonry Project $48,000 CV Maplecrest Community Center $500,000 CW The Galion Depot Canopy Restoration Project $200,000 CX The New Washington Veteran’s Memorial Park Project $34,460 CY Cuyahoga County Northcoast Connector $20,000,000 CZ Bedrock Riverfront Development $8,000,000 DA Rock and Roll Hall of Fame Museum Expansion and Renovation Project $7,000,000 DB Cleveland Port Bulk Terminal Modernization $5,000,000 DC West Side Market in Cleveland $2,400,000 DD Cahoon Park $2,000,000 DE Cleveland Zoo Primate Forest $2,000,000 DF Irishtown Bend Park $2,000,000 DG Valor Acres Brecksville Veterans Affairs Hospital Site Redevelopment $2,000,000 DH Blue Abyss $1,800,000 DI Two Foundation Building Purchase and Renovation $1,625,000 DJ Park Synagogue $1,500,000 DK The Music Settlement – Gries House Redevelopment $1,500,000 DL Brook Park Community Center Restoration $1,000,000 DM Cleveland Women’s Soccer Stadium $1,000,000 DN Electric Building Renovation $1,000,000 DO Independence Selig Drive Emergency Access $1,000,000 DP Shaker Heights Doan Brook Park $1,000,000 DQ YMCA of Greater Cleveland – New Facility Construction $1,000,000 DR Argonaut Project - Advancing Aviation and Maritime Pipeline $800,000 DS Birthing Beautiful Communities Birth Center $800,000 DT Connecting the Circle $800,000 DU Glenville YMCA $800,000 DV Saint Edwards High School Sustainable Urban Agriculture $800,000 DW Cleveland Public Square Improvements $750,000 DX University Heights Municipal Sewer Project $700,000 DY University Hospitals Breast Center - Parma $700,000 DZ Cleveland Habitat Building Project $507,500 EA Cleveland Airport NEOFIX $500,000 EB Euclid Public Library Green Branch Improvements $500,000 EC Hospice of the Western Reserve Center for Community Engagement and Hospice Care $500,000 ED JumpStart Northern Ohio Operations $500,000 EE Ohio Aerospace Institute Sensitive Information Research Facility $500,000 EF Rocky River Fire Station Improvements $500,000 EG Saint Casimir Parish Improvements $500,000 EH Seven Hills Fire Department $500,000 EI Vocational Guidance Services Renovation Cleveland Facility $500,000 EJ YWCA of Greater Cleveland $500,000 EK Boys and Girls Club of Broadway in Cuyahoga County $485,005 EL Maltz Museum of Jewish Heritage $480,000 EM Richmond Heights Salt Bin $450,000 EN Magnolia Clubhouse $400,000 EO Middleburg Heights Central Park Phase 1 $400,000 EP Cleveland Institute of Art - Interactive Media Lab $365,000 EQ Greenstone Lifeline Connection Improvements $327,867 ER Chagrin Valley Volunteer Fire Station $300,000 ES Berea City Hall and Police Station Upgrades $250,000 ET Jenning's Center for Older Adults $250,000 EU Journey Center for Safety and Healing/Domestic Violence Shelter $200,000 EV Lyndhurst Community Center Audio Visual Project $200,000 EW MetroHealth Emergency Department Refresh $200,000 EX Northeast Ohio Music Arts Development Hub $200,000 EY Olmsted Falls Visibility Project $200,000 EZ Achievement Centers for Children Westlake facility $100,000 FA Achievement Centers for Children Camp Cheerful facility $75,000 FB VFW Roof Repairs Solon Post 1863 $88,787 FC VFW Roof Repairs Parma Post 1974 $28,633 FD VFW Roof Repairs Cleveland Post 2533 $17,208 FE Western Ohio Regional Fire Training Facility $750,000 FF Eldora Speedway Public Safety Upgrades $400,000 FG Historic Bear’s Mill Infrastructure Restoration $275,000 FH The Darke County Fish and Game Association $120,000 FI Ney/Washington Township Fire Department Building $300,000 FJ Veterans Memorial Park at Latty’s Grove Rehabilitation Project $200,000 FK Little Brown Jug Grandstand Renovation $2,500,000 FL Sunbury Ohio-to-Erie Trail Expansion $1,250,000 FM Boardman Arts Park Improvements Whimsy Venue $1,000,000 FN Stockhands Horses for Healing, Capital Improvement Project $908,000 FO Dempsey Wildlife and Education Renovation $600,000 FP Delaware County Bicentennial Barn Renovation $500,000 FQ Powell Adventure Park Expansion $480,000 FR "Smuirfield" Golf Project $225,000 FS Ohio Fallen Heroes Memorial $70,000 FT VFW Roof Repairs Sunbury Post 8736 $58,440 FU Worenstaff Memorial Public Library Renovation $34,000 FV The Landing in Erie County $3,000,000 FW Battery Park Coastal Improvements $1,000,000 FX NW Ohio Water Quality Improvements/Cold Creek Foundation $800,000 FY Camp Timberlane Infrastructure Improvements $600,000 FZ Kelley's Island East Lakeshore Shoreline Protection $400,000 GA Erie County Fairgrounds Infrastructure Improvements $250,000 GB Erie County Jail Surveillance Upgrades $200,000 GC Huron Boat Basin and Amphitheater Capital Improvement Project $200,000 GD Sawmill Creek Wastewater Treatment Plant Expansion $200,000 GE Violet Township Event Center $2,100,000 GF Gateway Mixed Use District $2,000,000 GG Government Services Building Acquisition and Renovation $2,000,000 GH Wendel Pool Dehumidification System Replacement $550,000 GI Walnut Township Flood Mitigation $500,000 GJ Pickerington Covered Bridge Rehabilitation $350,000 GK Pickerington Connects $234,410 GL Elmwood Playground $225,000 GM Expanding Horizons – Meals on Wheels Senior Services Center $200,000 GN Historic Lancaster Bell and Clock Tower $150,000 GO Sycamore Creek Park Pond Restoration $125,000 GP Wagnalls Memorial Window Project $50,000 GQ American Legion Post 283 Improvements $20,000 GR Rushville Union Lions Club Accessible Parking $5,500 GS Jeffersonville Rattlesnake Water System Improvements $1,000,000 GT Wayne Township Firehouse Community Shelter $175,000 GU The Ohio Center for Advanced Technologies $20,000,000 GV Columbus Symphony Orchestra – Music for All $18,500,000 GW Downtown Columbus Capital Line $10,000,000 GX Heritage Trail Expansion $8,000,000 GY John Glenn International Airport Improvements $7,500,000 GZ OP Chaney Grain Elevator Restoration $2,800,000 HA Downtown Security Command Center $1,500,000 HB Unverferth House Revitalization and Expansion Campaign $1,500,000 HC Historic Dublin Riverfront Revitalization $1,230,000 HD Heartland Music Incubator $1,000,000 HE Norwich Township Fire Department Station 84 $1,000,000 HF Westland Mall Renovations $1,000,000 HG Hilliard First Responders Park $800,500 HH Green Lawn Cemetery Chapel $750,000 HI Heinzerling Facility Improvements $750,000 HJ Whitehall Police Department Emergency Facility $605,220 HK Knoll View Place $600,000 HL Tolles Cybersecurity Lab Renovation $600,000 HM Edison Welding Institute Renovations $500,000 HN Elevate Northland $500,000 HO LifeTown Kindness Center $500,000 HP National Center for Urban Solutions Facility $500,000 HQ Scioto Rise Place $500,000 HR Dublin Brand Road Pedestrian Tunnel Flood Mitigation $468,000 HS OZEM Gardner House Rehabilitation $375,000 HT Somali Community Link Center $350,000 HU The Refuge $250,000 HV Grandview Heights Fire EMS Police Facility $200,000 HW Grandview Heights McKinley Field Park $200,000 HX Tawnya Salyer Memorial Statue $200,000 HY Columbus Urban League Career Connect Hub $150,000 HZ Boys and Girls Club of J. Ashburn $138,585 IA VFW Roof Repairs Reynoldsburg Post 9473 $32,695 IB Building the Future of 4-H Camp Palmer $1,825,000 IC Community Event and Recreational Facility Renovation in Wauseon $500,000 ID Fulton County Fairgrounds Arts and Craft Building $80,000 IE Gallia County Council on Aging New Facility $2,500,000 IF Reservoir Enhancement Project $2,250,000 IG Gallia County Sheriff Office Renovation $225,000 IH Hambden Fire Station Project $2,000,000 II Montville Fire Station Construction $1,250,000 IJ Chardon Fire Department Equipment Project $1,000,000 IK Burton Berkshire Local Schools Career Pathways Program $915,037 IL Geauga County Fair $500,000 IM Russell Township Community Building $370,905 IN Chester Township Police Department Building Renovation $348,875 IO Chardon Memorial Stadium Restroom and Concession Project $250,000 IP Geauga County Safety Center Parking Lot $250,000 IQ Salt Dome Structural Repairs $155,000 IR St. Mary School Playground Enhancements $4,000 IS Cedarville Opera House $12,000,000 IT Clifton Union School Improvements $3,900,000 IU Future Development of Wright-Patterson $3,500,000 IV Clifton Opera House $1,900,000 IW Skyway SCIF Center $1,000,000 IX Spring House Park: Phase One $1,000,000 IY WSU: Archive Facility Upgrades $500,000 IZ OhioMeansJobs Greene County Improving Accessibility Project $175,000 JA Ohio Veterans’ Children’s Home Expansion and Upgrade, Phase 1 $150,000 JB Cambridge YMCA $3,000,000 JC Route 40 East Sewer Extension $1,000,000 JD Cambridge Fire Department Renovations $560,000 JE Old Washington Community VFD Station $250,000 JF Hamilton County Convention Center District Development $46,000,000 JG University of Cincinnati Health $16,750,000 JH Xavier University College of Osteopathic Medicine $9,750,000 JI Riverbend 2.0 $8,000,000 JJ Blue Line Foundation HQ and Regional Training Center $1,000,000 JK 605 Plum Convention Center Garage Renovation $945,771 JL Boys and Girls Club of Taft $300,978 JM Boys and Girls Club of East Hamilton $194,722 JN Boys and Girls Club of Sheakley $58,529 JO Findlay YMCA $1,250,000 JP Hancock County Fair $500,000 JQ Hancock County Park District $250,000 JR Owens State Community College CDL Facilities $250,000 JS Ada War Memorial Park $500,000 JT Hardin County Fair $500,000 JU Kenton Fire Department $500,000 JV Ohio Northern University HealthWise Mobile Health Clinic $500,000 JW Pump House Funding – Rodney Hensel $200,000 JX Hardin County Veterans Memorial Park District $50,000 JY Alger Baseball Field $40,000 JZ Harrison County Fairground Replacement and Enhancement $720,000 KA Regional Safety Center at Tappan Lake $650,000 KB Jewett Fire and Emergency Equipment Storage Building $325,000 KC Village of Bowerston VFD $205,000 KD Village of Bowerston Maintenance Building $100,000 KE Napoleon Public Library Improvements $1,000,000 KF The Henry County Community Event Center Office Addition $1,000,000 KG Corn City Regional Fire District New Fire Station $500,000 KH Napoleon Water Tower Upgrades $135,000 KI Core Networking Equipment at The Center for Child and Family Advocacy (CCFA) in Henry County $72,000 KJ Malinta Community Historical Society Site Project $45,000 KK Highland County Engineer Truck Barn Courthouse $1,000,000 KL Camp Wyandot Historic Camper Cabin Project $50,000 KM Union Furnace / Starr Township Improvements $35,000 KN Agricultural Society Millersburg Expo $750,000 KO Safe Harbor Ohio $500,000 KP Winesburg Park Improvements $250,000 KQ West Holmes Local Schools Robotics Program $22,000 KR Norwalk Theater Restoration $2,000,000 KS Norwalk Public Library Rehab $400,000 KT Feichtner Memorial Building Improvements $250,000 KU Huron County Transfer Station Scale Replacement $202,000 KV Jackson County Memorial Building Renovation $2,500,000 KW City of Jackson Park and Trail Revitalization $1,000,000 KX Jackson County Courthouse Building and Grounds Renovation $600,000 KY Blamer Park Renovation $392,038 KZ Wellston Food Pantry Turn-Key Renovation $200,000 LA Wellston Fire Department Training Academy $175,000 LB Jefferson County Agricultural Society Small Animal Barn $35,000 LC Mount Vernon Police Station $2,000,000 LD Fredericktown Water Infrastructure Improvements $750,000 LE Family Fun Grounds in Knox County $125,000 LF Willoughby Osborne Park Shoreline Protection $2,000,000 LG Uptown Mentor Revitalization $1,500,000 LH ISTEM Painesville Township Haden Facility and Crowns Project $1,000,000 LI Mentor Fire Station $1,000,000 LJ University Hospitals TriPoint Breast Center - Painesville $938,750 LK Concord Township Waterline Extension Project $500,000 LL Lake Erie College Center for Health Sciences $500,000 LM Lake Metro Parks Lakefront Trail $500,000 LN Kirtland Public Library Roof Project $340,625 LO Mentor on the Lake – Lake Overlook $300,000 LP Rabbit Run Theater Improvements $100,000 LQ VFW Roof Repairs Mentor Post 9295 $35,478 LR Resources for Restoring Lives and Providing Safety and Security $15,328 LS Wayne National Forest Welcome Center $5,000,000 LT Coal Grove Village Riverfront Park $1,250,000 LU Lawrence County School Communications $750,000 LV Necco Center Improvements $375,000 LW Boys and Girls Club of Portsmouth $100,000 LX Buckeye Lake North Shore Park and Pier $8,500,000 LY Memorial Health Systems Education and Event Center $3,000,000 LZ Johnstown - Mink Street Water Infrastructure $500,000 MA Newark Towne Center Project $1,854,000 MB Buckeye Valley Family YMCA Pataskala Childcare Center $200,000 MC Mary Ann Township Fire Department $66,000 MD Hanover Hains Hill Drive Drainage Improvements $52,000 ME Junior Achievement - Regional Satellite Learning Center $50,000 MF Boys and Girls Club of Newark $46,195 MG Indian Lake Advocacy Group $5,000,000 MH Logan County Sewer District Flat Branch Upgrades $1,500,000 MI Bellefontaine Calvary Christian School $250,000 MJ Indian Lake Pickleball $150,000 MK Lorain County Community College Desich Entrepreneurship Center 3rd Floor Microelectronics Training Hub $2,500,000 ML Lorain County Fairs $2,500,000 MM Boys and Girls Club of Elyria South $1,000,000 MN Lorain County PACE Site Modifications $1,000,000 MO The Nord Center Capital Improvement Project $1,000,000 MP French Creek Sports Complex $925,000 MQ Lorain County Justice Center $750,000 MR North Ridgeville Cypress Avenue Project $700,000 MS Sheffield Lake Field House Rec Complex $600,000 MT Black River Landing Amphitheater $500,000 MU Haven Center Emergency Shelter / Neighborhood Alliance $500,000 MV Vocational Guidance Services (VGS) Project - Lorain $500,000 MW Lorain County Health and Dental Facility $375,000 MX Elyria Public Library West River Branch $300,000 MY Lorain Hispanic Veterans Memorial $300,000 MZ Lorain County Kennel Project $250,000 NA El Centro Facility Improvements $200,000 NB Good Knights Bed Building Center $150,000 NC Sheffield Village Colorado Avenue Side Path $150,000 ND Carlisle Township Hall Project $100,000 NE VFW Roof Repairs Wellington Post 6941 $12,276 NF Lucas County Seawall and River Edge Reconstruction Project $3,000,000 NG Toledo Innovation Center $3,000,000 NH Inclusive Multigenerational Community and Recreation Center (IMCRC) $2,900,000 NI Virginia Stranahan Trail and Senior Affordable Housing/Senior Center Development $2,700,000 NJ Eugene F. Kranz Toledo Express Airport Terminal Renovation Project $2,000,000 NK Toledo YWCA Domestic Shelter Project $2,000,000 NL Toledo Zoo Reptile House $1,740,000 NM Toledo Fire and Rescue Department Facility Repairs $1,600,000 NN Ottawa Park Revitalization Phase 1 $950,000 NO Imagination Station; Toledo Science Center World of Discovery Exhibit $750,000 NP Homer Hanham Boys and Girls Club Renovation $650,000 NQ Toledo Seagate Food Bank $650,000 NR Pre-Medical and Health Science Academy at Mercy College $500,000 NS Toledo School for the Performing Arts Replacement Windows $500,000 NT Sylvania Township Safety Training and Grounds Improvement $485,000 NU Toledo Safe Haven Ronald McDonald Facility $300,000 NV Whitney Manor $300,000 NW Toledo Hensville Entertainment District $250,000 NX Ottawa Hills Walk Path Project $175,000 NY Glass City Mural Wall Lighting (Toledo) $100,000 NZ Lucas County Sheriff Substation Renovation $100,000 OA Toledo Broadway Commercial Redevelopment Project $100,000 OB Madison County Airport Improvements $35,938 OC Animal Charity of Ohio Infrastructure Expansion $1,500,000 OD Community Learning Center $1,000,000 OE West Branch Regional Community Education and Wellness Training Center in Mahoning County $875,000 OF Mahoning Valley Historical Society Expansion and Improvement $750,000 OG Campbell Access and Safety ProjectMahoning County Road Improvements $660,000 OH Mahoning County Veterans Center $650,000 OI Salem Airpark Improvements $600,000 OJ Youngstown Area Jewish Federation Building Expansion $501,389 OK Mahoning Valley Regional Multi-Jurisdictional Infrastructure Initiative $450,000 OL Boys and Girls Club of Youngstown $300,000 OM Youngstown Playhouse Roof $238,000 ON Village of Poland $185,000 OO Boys and Girls Club of Oak Hill $159,131 OP City of Struthers Mauthe Park Splash Pad $103,150 OQ Rich Center for Autism Building for Tomorrow Phase 2 $100,000 OR OCCHA Renovado Capital Campaign $93,500 OS Canfield Police Department Drone Program $60,000 OT War Vet Museum Facility and Program Improvement Project $60,000 OU Austintown 9-11 Memorial Park $50,000 OV VFW Roof Repairs Ellsworth Post 9571 $14,480 OW Marion Harding Performing Arts Center $347,000 OX Magnetic Springs Community Park $153,000 OY Marion Soldiers and Sailors Memorial Chapel $450,000 OZ George W. King Mansion – Etowah $300,000 PA Boys and Girls Club of Oak Street $277,170 PB Terradise Nature Center Interpretive Center $200,000 PC Women’s History Resource Center Phase II $185,000 PD City of Wadsworth Brickyard Athletic Complex and Fixler Reservation $2,500,000 PE Lake Medina $1,500,000 PF Akron Childrens Medina Health Center $1,400,000 PG Medina County Career Center Modular Fire Training Tower $1,000,000 PH Oenslager Nature Center $500,000 PI City of Medina Multi-Use Uptown Loop Phase 1 $396,000 PJ Medina County Radio System – Seville Tower $450,000 PK Medina County Sheriff Office Jail Safety Enhancement $200,000 PL Equine Assisted Mental Health Community Campus $200,000 PM Majestic Equine Connections $200,000 PN Main Street Medina Facade Improvement $150,000 PO Medina County Achievement Center Renovation and Innovative Vocational Training Building $100,000 PP Serenite Restaurant and Culinary Institute Roof/Gutter Repair $65,000 PQ Main Street Medina South Town Gateway $62,000 PR VFW Roof Repairs Medina Post 5137 $60,898 PS Homer Township Tornado Siren Project $36,834 PT Chippewa Lake Area Emergency Siren $35,000 PU Ohio University Airport Improvements $2,500,000 PV Meigs County Transportation Hub $1,500,000 PW Racine Entertainment District $1,500,000 PX 1872 Hall Complex $250,000 PY Meigs County Fair $250,000 PZ Fort Recovery Water Tower $600,000 QA Troy Great Miami River Recreation Connectivity Project $2,000,000 QB Troy-Miami County Public Library Improvements $500,000 QC Bethel Township VFD Improvements $400,000 QD Graysville and Community VFD Improvements $250,000 QE Bethel Community Center Improvements $183,000 QF Woodsfield Government and Community Center $100,000 QG Midway Community and Senior Citizens $70,000 QH Laings Community Center $23,000 QI VFW Roof Repairs Sardis Post 9930 $19,836 QJ Miami Chapel Inspire Zone Youth Workforce Development Center – Boys & Girls Club $3,000,000 QK Dayton Aviation Heritage Site (Wright Factory) $2,000,000 QL Dayton International Airport Concourse B $2,000,000 QM Future Development of Wright-Patterson $1,500,000 QN Healthy Family Market / Dayton Children's Pediatric Center $1,500,000 QO Tri-Cities North Regional Wastewater Authority $1,500,000 QP Kettering Business Park $1,250,000 QQ West Carrollton River District and Whitewater Park $500,000 QR Countryside Park Revitalization $1,000,000 QS Ronald McDonald House of Dayton $1,000,000 QT Schuster Center $1,000,000 QU Union Ring Road Completion Project - Phase II $1,000,000 QV Uptown Centerville Connectivity and Development Improvements $1,000,000 QW Harrison Township Police Headquarters Renovation $950,000 QX Saint Vincent de Paul Community Donation Intake Facility $800,000 QY Saint Vincent de Paul Social Services Emergency Shelter for Men $500,000 QZ Homefull Housing, Food and Jobs Center $750,000 RA Jefferson Township Community Improvements $600,000 RB BOLT Innovation Center $500,000 RC Centerville Schools Safety Access $500,000 RD Dayton Dream Center Transitional Housing $500,000 RE East End Whole Family Services Hub Facility Expansion and Renovation in Dayton $500,000 RF Union Ring Road Completion Project - Phase III $500,000 RG Robinette Park $400,000 RH Homefull’s Healthy Start Child Care & Early Learning Center West Dayton $350,000 RI Dayton Airshow $300,000 RJ Germantown Covered Bridge $275,000 RK Dayton Clothes that Work! Facility Improvements $250,000 RL Flyghtwood Sports Life and Leadership Campus $250,000 RM Grant Park Accessibility Improvements $250,000 RN K-12 Gallery and TEJAS Acquisition Project $250,000 RO Miami Township Public Works $250,000 RP Old North Dayton Park Expansion Project $250,000 RQ Catholic Social Services Supervised Visitation Center $200,000 RR Dayton Alvis, Inc. $195,149 RS Boys and Girls Club of Dayton $154,851 RT Preservation of Dayton Woman’s Club Historic Mansion $100,000 RU West Memory Gardens Flood Mitigation Project $75,000 RV German Township Channel Maintenance $60,000 RW Miamisburg Historical Society Improvements $40,000 RX Pennsville Volunteer Fire Department – New Building Construction $1,500,000 RY Historic Preservation, Job Creation, and Healthcare Expansion at the Stanbery Building (McConnelsville) $500,000 RZ Malta/McConnelsville Equipment Project $325,000 SA Chesterhill VFD Station $250,000 SB Morgan County Emergency Communications Center $250,000 SC Morgan County Fair $250,000 SD Reinersville Volunteer Fire Department $50,000 SE Flying Horse Farms Renovation and Updates to Facilities $350,000 SF Morrow County Engineers Facility $250,000 SG Morrow County Health Department Renovations $250,000 SH Water Filter Installation for Legacy Phosphorus Fields $500,000 SI The Wilds Giraffe Barn and Innovative Guest Lodging $2,500,000 SJ Avondale Youth Center HVAC Upgrade $450,000 SK The Tribe Athletic Complex Track $1,000,000 SL Ottawa County Workforce Hub and Center for Career Advancement $1,250,000 SM Skills Academy in Ottawa County $250,000 SN Ottawa County Fairgrounds Upgrades $200,000 SO Put-In-Bay Downtown Promenade Renovation $200,000 SP Genoa Civic Theatre Improvements $100,000 SQ Paulding County Agricultural Society Racetrack Lighting Improvement $41,000 SR Antwerp Rotary Basketball Court $40,000 SS Perry County Community Access and Workforce Training $500,000 ST Reading Township Volunteer Fire Department $1,250,000 SU Thornville AMVETS 51 $80,000 SV South Bloomfield Corridor Improvements $1,500,000 SW Ohio Christian University for Science $500,000 SX Pickaway County Library $250,000 SY Memorial Hall Window Replacement Project $200,000 SZ Pike Emergency Operations Backup Power Project $750,000 TA Ravenna Health Center $1,500,000 TB Serenity House Residential Facility $700,000 TC Happy Trails Farm Animal Sanctuary Welcome Center $500,000 TD Kent Safety Town $250,000 TE Shalersville Park $225,000 TF Freedom Township Historical Society Historical Museum $105,000 TG Buchert Park Improvements $51,000 TH Portage County Children’s Advantage HVAC $40,000 TI Windham Historical Society $27,950 TJ Preble County Fairgrounds Stall Barns $700,000 TK Preble Gratis Well Reconstruction $50,000 TL Fort Jennings Park Pedestrian Bridge and Park Improvements $350,000 TM The Ottoville Park Community Wellness and Recreation Enhancement Project $213,000 TN Womens Policy and Resource Center $100,000 TO Buckeye Park Improvements $40,000 TP Mansfield Christian School Improvements $1,500,000 TQ Avita Comprehensive Cancer Center $1,150,000 TR Plymouth Fire Department Building Replacement $600,000 TS Mansfield Theater "Road to 100" Renovation $500,000 TT YMCA-North Central Ohio Sports Complex $500,000 TU Main Street Plaza Improvement Project $250,000 TV Richland County Agricultural Society $100,000 TW VFW Roof Repairs Mansfield Post 3494 $27,964 TX Ohio Genealogical Society Archives Security $10,000 TY Hopewell Regional Visitor Center $5,000,000 TZ Union Township Fire Department Project $175,000 UA Fremont Downtown Revitalization $1,350,000 UB Hayes Presidential Library Improvements $300,000 UC Fremont Water Access Emergency Response $150,000 UD Shawnee State University College of Health and Human Services $5,000,000 UE Appalachian Youth Behavioral Health Services Expansion $2,000,000 UF Scioto County Safety Operations Center $696,000 UG Scioto County Fairgrounds $600,000 UH Green Township Garage $500,000 UI Installer Technician Registered Apprenticeship in Scioto County $323,150 UJ Portsmouth Courtroom Renovations $240,000 UK Bloom-Vernon Local Schools Lighting $51,600 UL Seneca County Agricultural Center $370,000 UM Fostoria Learning Center Security $352,000 UN Seneca County Museum Interior Revitalization $190,000 UO Bettsville Emergency Medical Services Renovation $150,000 UP Attica-Venice Township Joint Cemetery Mausoleum $93,742 UQ Court Street Streetscape Project $50,000 UR Ritz Theatre Marquee Renovation $30,000 US Fort Loramie Industrial Park $724,000 UT Midwest Regional ESC Resilient Heights Improvements $600,000 UU Shelby County Community Workforce Training Center $500,000 UV Boys and Girls Club of Massillon $193,904 UW VFW Roof Repairs Louisville Post 7490 $42,970 UX Hall of Fame Village $9,763,126 UY Pro Football Hall of Fame Modernization $7,000,000 UZ Stark County Juvenile Detention System Demolition $64,200 VA Cascade Plaza $5,000,000 VB New Franklin Sewer Project $3,800,000 VC Akron-Canton Airport West Side Development for Aeronautic Activity $3,200,000 VD Cuyahoga Falls Regional Fire Training Complex $3,000,000 VE Akron Art Museum – Center for Digital Discovery $2,000,000 VF Akron Zoo Veterinary Hospital $1,750,000 VG Akron Community Health Center Addiction One Campus Expansion $1,250,000 VH Barberton City Hall and Justice Center $1,000,000 VI Summit County Mobile Medical Project $1,000,000 VJ Boston Heights Safety Center $986,831 VK Middle School Trades Education Center in Summit County $750,000 VL Hudson Inclusive Playground $680,000 VM Summit County Fairgrounds New Agriculture Center $600,000 VN Macedonia Service Center $500,000 VO Child Guidance and Family Solutions – Multi-Campus $450,000 VP Boys and Girls Club - Steve Wise $440,913 VQ Akron Urban League Building Improvements $400,000 VR Legacy Building Project Improvements $400,000 VS Bath North Fork Preserve Improvements $170,000 VT Copley Road Trail East $150,000 VU G.A.R. Hall Rehabilitation $150,000 VV Stark State Oil and Natural Gas Job Training Equipment $100,000 VW Stow First Responders Memorial $95,863 VX Special Education Cornerstone Community School $76,393 VY Boston Township Hall ADA Upgrades $50,000 VZ Cortland Safety Service Complex / Training Facility $2,150,000 WA West Warren Industrial Park Traffic and Fire Suppression Improvements $1,500,000 WB Holy Trinity Orthodox Christian Academy and Preschool $1,000,000 WC Eastwood Field Renovations $500,000 WD Trumbull County Fairgrounds Grandstand Renovation $500,000 WE Cortland’s Outdoor Education & Event Space $350,000 WF Bloomfield Regional Emergency Medical Services Renovation Project $345,000 WG Mosquito Lake State Park Water Improvements $330,350 WH Camp Sugarbush Infrastructure Improvements $300,000 WI John F. Kennedy Renovation Project $300,000 WJ Hubbard Outpost Sanitary Sewer Project $175,000 WK Liberty Township Fencing Project $100,000 WL Victory Christian School Renovation $100,000 WM Tuscarawas County Facilities Investments in Health, Safety, and Election Security $2,500,000 WN Tuscarawas County Engineer Building $1,350,000 WO Cleveland Clinic Union Hospital Cancer Center $1,000,000 WP Fire, EMT, Law Enforcement Burn Building $500,000 WQ Norma Johnson Center Improvements (Red Barn and Brandywine) $250,000 WR Dover Public Library Roof Replacement Project $85,731 WS Transportation Research Center, Inc. Impact Lab Upgrades $24,000,000 WT Richwood Pickleball $218,000 WU Leesburg Township Walking Trail and Playground Project $162,545 WV The Village of Richwood Fairgrounds $49,849 WW Northwest State Community College Van Wert Campus Renovation $1,000,000 WX Van Wert Regional Airport Runway Project $600,000 WY VFW Roof Repairs Van Wert Post 5803 $41,754 WZ Middle Point Memorial Park $25,000 XA Moser Park Concession Stand Replacement $19,860 XB Wilkesville Township Outdoor Warning Siren $35,000 XC Cincinnati Open Tennis Tournament $27,500,000 XD Warren County Ion Exchange Project $200,000 XE Waynesville and Maineville Girl Scout Camp Improvements $200,000 XF VFW Roof Repairs Mason Post 9622 $9,969 XG Mid Ohio Valley Aquatic Center $750,000 XH Decatur Township Building Construction $350,000 XI Boys and Girls Club of Marietta $213,909 XJ Marietta Saint Mary of the Assumption Roof Project $150,000 XK Betsy Mills Drainage Project $79,000 XL Marietta College Womens Softball Complex $50,000 XM VFW Roof Repairs New Matamoras Post 6387 $13,740 XN Shreve Wastewater Treatment Plant System Improvements $1,750,000 XO Wooster Community Hospital Improvements $1,000,000 XP Wayne County Agricultural Society, Inc. $415,000 XQ Wayne County Airport Hangar Construction Project $350,000 XR Wayne County Emergency Vehicle Drivers Training Course $300,000 XS Boys and Girls Club of Orrville $280,318 XT Boys and Girls Club of Edgewood $186,771 XU Foodsphere Commercial Kitchen/Food Marketplace $100,000 XV Edgerton Community Center $425,000 XW Installation of Elevator to North Annex Building in Williams County $187,076 XX Wabash Cannonball Trail: Design Engineering $153,500 XY Wood County Engineer Garage and Maintenance Facility (Bowling Green) $1,000,000 XZ Wood County Educational Service Center $750,000 YA Positive Community Connections Center Project (Bowling Green) $600,000 YB Wood County Committee on Aging $500,000 YC City of Perrysburg $200,000 YD North Baltimore Public Library Emergency Repairs $100,000 YE Wood County Public Library Heating Project $100,000 YF Upper Sandusky Midway Industrial Park $400,000 YG VFW Roof Repairs Carey Post 3759 $20,712 Section 605.11. That existing Section 200.30 of H.B. 2 of the 135th General Assembly (as amended by H.B. 184 of the 136th General Assembly) is hereby repealed. Section 610.10. That Sections 333.70, 353.20, 423.85, and 423.103 of H.B. 96 of the 136th General Assembly be amended to read as follows: Sec. 333.70. WORK COMMUNITY ENGAGEMENT PROGRAM - COUNTY COSTS Upon the request of the Medicaid Director, the Director of Budget and Management may transfer state share appropriations in each fiscal year between appropriation item 651525, Medicaid Health Care Services, within the Department of Medicaid, and 655522, Medicaid Program Support – Local, within the Department of Job and Family Services. If such a transfer occurs, the Director of Budget and Management shall adjust, using the federal reimbursement rate, the federal share appropriations of appropriation item 651525, Medicaid Health Care Services, within the Department of Medicaid, and appropriation item 655624, Medicaid Program Support – Federal, within the Department of Job and Family Services. Any increase in funding shall be provided to county departments of job and family services and shall only be used for costs related to processing cases for work requirements for the expansion eligibility group that are established under the medicaid waiver component required under section 5166.37 of the Revised Code, or established by Pub. Law No. 119-21, and as prescribed by the Medicaid Director. These funds shall not be used for existing and ongoing operating expenses. The Medicaid Director shall establish criteria for distributing these funds and for county departments of job and family services to submit allowable expenses. Sec. 353.20. INDEPENDENT LIVING The foregoing appropriation item 415402, Independent Living Council, shall be provided to the Ohio Statewide Independent Living Council to support its operations under the State Plan for Independent Living. Of the foregoing appropriation item 415511, Centers for Independent Living, the amount needed in each fiscal year for state matching funds for the Federal Independent Living Grant shall be provided to support the state independent living programs and centers under Title VII of the federal "Rehabilitation Act of 1973," 29 U.S.C. 701, et seq., as amended by the Rehabilitation Act Amendments of 1992 and known as the federal Independent Living Services and Centers for Independent Living. Of the foregoing appropriation item 415511, Centers for Independent Living, up to $1,355,608 in each fiscal year may be used as state matching funds to provide vocational rehabilitation services to Ohioans with disabilities. Of the foregoing appropriation item 415511, Centers for Independent Living, $74,124 in each fiscal year shall be used as state matching funds for vocational rehabilitation innovation and expansion activities. The foregoing appropriation item 415613, Independent Living, shall be used to support the operations of the Centers for Independent Living in accordance with the State Plan for Independent Living. ASSISTIVE TECHNOLOGY The foregoing appropriation item 415406, Assistive Technology, shall be provided to Assistive Technology of Ohio to provide grants and assistive technology services for people with disabilities in the state of Ohio. BRAIN INJURY Of the foregoing appropriation item 415431, Brain Injury, $450,000 in each fiscal year shall be provided to The Ohio State University College of Medicine to support the Brain Injury Program established under section 3335.60 of the Revised Code. The remainder of appropriation item 415431, Brain Injury, shall be provided to the Brain Injury Association of Ohio for direct services and supports for brain injury survivors and caregivers. SERVICES FOR THE DEAF The foregoing appropriation item 415508, Services for the Deaf, shall be used to support community centers for the deaf. VISUALLY IMPAIRED READING SERVICES The foregoing appropriation item 415512, Visually Impaired Reading Services, shall be used to support VOICEcorps Reading Services to provide reading services for blind individuals. DEAFBLIND FUND The foregoing appropriation item 415515, DeafBlind Fund, shall be distributed to the Columbus Speech and Hearing Center used for the recruitment and training of support service providers and to connect support service providers with DeafBlind individuals. An amount equal to the unexpended, unencumbered balance of appropriation item 415515, DeafBlind Fund, at the end of fiscal year 2026 is hereby reappropriated to the same appropriation item for the same purpose in fiscal year 2027. SIGHT CENTERS Of the foregoing appropriation item 415617, Independent Living Older Blind, $30,000 in each fiscal year shall be used to contract in equal amounts with the Cleveland Sight Center, the Cincinnati Association for the Blind and Visually Impaired, and the Sight Center of Northwest Ohio to provide outreach to the community of individuals with blindness or low vision. Sec. 423.85. CHILD CARE CRED PROGRAM The foregoing appropriation item 830414, Child Care Cred Program, shall be used for the Child Care Cred Program established in section 5104.54 of the Revised Code. An amount equal to the unexpended, unencumbered balance of appropriation item 830414, Child Care Cred Program, at the end of fiscal year 2026 is hereby reappropriated to the same appropriation item for the same purpose in fiscal year 2027. Sec. 423.103. CHILD CARE PROVIDER RECRUITMENT The foregoing appropriation item 830418, Child Care Provider Recruitment, shall be used for the Child Care Provider Recruitment and Mentorship Grant Program established in Section 751.30 of this actH.B. 96 of the 136th General Assembly. An amount equal to the unexpended, unencumbered balance of appropriation item 830418, Child Care Provider Recruitment, at the end of fiscal year 2026 is hereby reappropriated to the same appropriation item for the same purpose in fiscal year 2027. Section 610.11. That existing Sections 333.70, 353.20, 423.85, and 423.103 of H.B. 96 of the 136th General Assembly are hereby repealed. Section 805.10. The items of law contained in this act, and their applications, are severable. If an item of law contained in this act, or if an application of an item of law contained in this act, is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other items of law contained in this act and their applications that can be given effect without the invalid item or application. Speaker ___________________ of the House of Representatives. President ___________________ of the Senate. Passed ________________________, 20____ Approved ________________________, 20____ Governor. This act is not of a general and permanent nature and does not require a code section number. Director, Legislative Service Commission. Filed in the office of the Secretary of State at Columbus, Ohio, on the ____ day of ___________, A. D. 20____. Secretary of State. File No. _________	Effective Date ___________________